<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88815-0032 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.8-15-88.f2.A1031</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register </T4>/ Vol. 53, No. 157 / Monday, August 15, 1988/ Proposed Rules <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Food and Drug Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">21 CFR Parts 310, 346, and 369 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 80N-0050] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Anorectal Drug Products for Over-the-Counter Human Use; TentativeFinal Monograph </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Food and Drug Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of proposed rulemaking. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Food and Drug Administration (FDA) is issuing a noticeof proposed rulemaking in the form of a tentative final monograph thatwould establish conditions under which over-the-counter (OTC) anorectaldrug products for the relief of symptoms associated with hemorrhoids andother anorectal disorders are generally recognized as safe and effectiveand not misbranded. FDA is issuing this notice of proposed rulemaking afterconsidering the report and recommendations of the Advisory Review Panelon OTC Hemorrhoidal Drug Products and public comments on an advance noticeof proposed rulemaking that was based on those recommendations. This proposalis part of the ongoing review of OTC drug products conducted by FDA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Written comments, objections, or requests for oral hearingon the proposed regulation before the Commissioner of Food and Drugs byDecember 13, 1988. Because of the length and complexity of this proposedregulation, the agency is allowing a period of 120 days for comments andobjections instead of the normal 60 days. New data by August 15, 1989.Comments on the new data by October 15, 1989. Written comments on the agency'seconomic impact determination by December 13, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>Written comments, objections, new data, or requestsfor oral hearing to the Dockets Management Branch (HFA-305), Food and DrugAdministration, Rm. 4-62, 5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>William E. Gilbertson, Centerfor Drug Evaluation and Research (HFD-210), Food and Drug Administration,5600 Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857, 301-295-8000.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>In the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of May 27, 1980 (45 FR 35576), FDA published,under andSection; 330.10(a)(6) (21 CFR 330.10(a)(6)), an advance notice ofproposed rulemaking to establish a monograph for OTC anorectal drug products,together with the recommendations of the Advisory Review Panel on OTC HemorrhoidalDrug Products (Hemorrhoidal Panel), which was the advisory review panelresponsible for evaluating data on the active ingredients in this drugclass. Interested persons were invited to submit comments by August 25,1980. Reply comments in response to comments filed in the initial commentperiod could be submitted by September 24, 1980. In a notice published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of September 26, 1980 (45 FR 63876), the agencyadvised that it had reopened the administrative record for OTC anorectaldrug products to allow for consideration of recommendations on camphor-containingdrug products that had been received from the Advisory Review Panel onOTC Miscellaneous External Drug Products (Miscellaneous External Panel)after the date the administrative record previously had officially closed.The agency concluded that the Miscellaneous External Panel's recommendationsshould be available to the agency in developing a proposed regulation onanorectal drug products in the form of a tentative final monograph. (Seecomment 21 below.) In accordance with andSection; 330.10(a)(10), the data and information consideredby the Panel were put on public display in the Dockets Management Branch(HFA-305), Food and Drug Administration (address above), after deletionof a small amount of trade secret information. Data and information receivedafter the administrative record was reopened have also been put on displayin the Dockets Management Branch. In response to the advance notice of proposed rulemaking, nine drug manufacturers,one drug manufacturers' association, six health professionals, and oneconsumer submitted comments. Copies of the comments received are on publicdisplay in the Dockets Management Branch. The advance notice of proposed rulemaking, which was published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on May 27, 1980 (45 FR 35576), was designatedas a ``proposed monograph'' in order to conform to terminology used inthe OTC drug review regulations (21 CFR 330.10). Similarly, the presentdocument is designated in the OTC drug review regulations as a ``tentativefinal monograph.'' Its legal status, however, is that of a proposed rule.In this tentative final monograph (proposed rule) to establish Part 346(21 CFR Part 346), FDA states for the first time its position on the establishmentof a monograph for OTC anorectal drug products. Final agency action onthis matter will occur with the publication at a future date of a finalmonograph, which will be a final rule establishing a monograph for OTCanorectal drug products. This proposal constitutes FDA's tentative adoption of the Panel's conclusionsand recommendations on OTC anorectal drug products as modified on the basisof the comments received and the agency's independent evaluation of thePanel's report. Modifications have been made for clarity and regulatoryaccuracy and to reflect new information. Such new information has beenplaced on file in the Dockets Management Branch (address above). Thesemodifications are reflected in the following summaries of the commentsand FDA's responses to them.In the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of February 8, 1983, the agency published a tentativefinal monograph for OTC external analgesic drug products which includeda labeling claim ``for external anal itching'' for hydrocortisone-containingproducts. After reviewing and evaluating that tentative final monographand in response to a comment submitted to the anorectal rulemaking, theagency has decided to retain the above labeling claim and hydrocortisonein the external analgesic rulemaking rather than include them in the anorectalrulemaking. In this way, the various conditions for which hydrocortisoneis effective will be listed in one monograph. In a future issue of the<T4>Federal Register</T4>, the agency will amend the tentative final monographfor OTC external analgesic drug products to include a requirement thathydrocortisone-containing products labeled for ``anal itching'' also belabeled with appropriate general warnings and directions consistent withother OTC anorectal drug products. (See comment 25 below.) The OTC drug procedural regulations (21 CFR 330.10) now provide that anytesting necessary to resolve the safety or effectiveness issues that formerlyresulted in a Category III classification, and submission to FDA of theresults of that testing or any other data, must be done during the OTCdrug rulemaking process before the establishment of a final monograph.Accordingly, FDA will no longer use the terms ``Category I'' (generallyrecognized as safe and effective and not misbranded), ``Category II'' (notgenerally recognized as safe and effective or misbranded), and ``CategoryIII'' (available data are insufficient to classify as safe and effective,and further testing is required) at the final monograph stage, but willuse instead the terms ``monograph conditions'' (old Category I) and ``nonmonographconditions'' (old Categories II and III). This document retains the conceptsof Categories I, II, and III at the tentative final monograph stage. The agency advises that the conditions under which the drug products thatare subject to this monograph would be generally recognized as safe andeffective and not misbranded (monograph conditions) will be effective 12months after the date of publication of the final monograph in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. On or after that date, no OTC drug product thatis subject to the monograph and that contains a nonmonograph condition,i.e., a condition that would cause the drug to be not generally recognizedas safe and effective or to be misbranded, may be initially introducedor initially delivered for introduction into interstate commerce unlessit is the subject of an approved application. Further, any OTC drug productsubject to this monograph that is repackaged or relabeled after the effectivedate of the monograph must be in compliance with the monograph regardlessof the date the product was initially introduced or initially deliveredfor introduction into interstate commerce. Manufacturers are encouragedto comply voluntarily with the monograph at the earliest possible date.In the advance notice of proposed rulemaking for OTC anorectal drug products(published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of May 27, 1980; 45 FR 35576), the agency suggestedthat the conditions included in the monograph (Category I) be effective30 days after the date of publication of the final monograph in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>and that the conditions excluded from the monograph(Category II) be eliminated from OTC drug products effective 6 months afterthe date of publication of the final monograph, regardless of whether furthertesting was undertaken to justify their future use. Experience has shownthat relabeling of products covered by the monograph is necessary in orderfor manufacturers to comply with the monograph. New labels containing themonograph labeling have to be written, ordered, received, and incorporatedinto the manufacturing process. The agency has determined that it is impracticalto expect new labeling to be in effect 30 days after the date of publicationof the final monograph. Experience has shown also that if the deadlinefor relabeling is too short, the agency is burdened with extension requestsand related paperwork. In addition, some products will have to be reformulated to comply withthe monograph. Reformulation often involves the need to do stability testingon the new product. An accelerated aging process may be used to test anew formulation; however, if the stability testing is not successful, andif further reformulation is required, there could be a further delay inhaving a new product available for manufacture. The agency wishes to establish a reasonable period of time for relabelingand reformulation in order to avoid an unnecessary disruption of the marketplacethat could not only result in economic loss, but also interfere with consumers'access to safe and effective drug products. Therefore, the agency is proposingthat the final monograph be effective 12 months after the date of its publicationin the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. The agency believes that within 12 months afterthe date of publication most manufacturers can order new labeling and reformulatetheir products and have them in compliance in the marketplace. If the agency determines that any labeling for a condition included inthe final monograph should be implemented sooner than the 12-month effectivedate, a shorter deadline may be established. Similarly, if a safety problemis identified for a particular nonmonograph condition, a shorter deadlinemay be set for removal of that condition from OTC drug products. All ``OTC Volumes'' cited throughout this document refer to the submissionsmade by interested persons pursuant to the call-for-data notice publishedin the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of April 26, 1973 (38 FR 10307) or to additionalinformation that has come to the agency's attention since publication ofthe advance notice of proposed rulemaking. The volumes are on public displayin the Dockets Management Branch (address above). <ITAG tagnum="84">I. The Agency's Tentative Conclusions on the Comments </ITAG>A. General Comments on Anorectal Drug Products 1. Two comments expressed their continuing position that OTC drug monographsare interpretive, as opposed to substantive, regulations. The commentsreferred to statements on this issue submitted earlier to other OTC drugrulemaking proceedings. The agency addressed this issue in paragraphs 85 through 91 of the preambleto the procedures for classification of OTC drug products, published inthe <T4>Federal Register </T4>of May 11, 1972 (37 FR 9464) and in paragraph3 of the preamble to the tentative final monograph for antacid drug products,published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of November 12, 1973 (38 FR 31260). FDA reaffirmsthe conclusions stated there. Subsequent court decisions have confirmedthe agency's authority to issue substantive regulations by rulemaking.See, e.g., <T3>National Nutritional Foods Association </T3>v. <T3>Weinberger, </T3>512 F.2d 688, 696-98 (2d Cir. 1975) and <T3>National Association of Pharmaceutical Manufacturers </T3>v. <T3>FDA, </T3>487 F. Supp. 412 (S.D.N.Y. 1980), <T3>aff'd, </T3>637 F.2d 887 (2d Cir. 1981).2. Several comments pointed out that a number of the Panel's recommendationsdo not represent the unanimous opinion of the Panel members because thePanel was divided four to three on many issues. Some of the comments arguedthat the minority view often demonstrated a greater clinical understandingthan the majority view. The comments urged FDA, when evaluating the Panel'srecommendations, to consider the minority view and the fact that therewas not a clear consensus of the Panel. Other comments contended that the Panel did not apply the same standardsin classifying the various active ingredients, arguing that pramoxine wasplaced in Category I on the basis of old and questionable data, while liveyeast cell derivative was placed in Category III despite objective datathat were endorsed by experts. The comments requested that the agency carefullyreview all of the Panel's recommendations to determine if the Panel tookan equitable approach in its evaluation of all ingredients contained inhemorrhoidal drug products. In evaluating the Panel's recommendations, the agency has considered thecomments' criticisms, reviewed the data submitted to the Panel, consideredthe minority's views, reviewed the current scientific literature, and evaluatednew data submitted since the Panel's report was published. The agency'sproposals in this tentative final monograph are based on considerationof all of these factors. (See comments 14 and 23 below for specific discussionsof pramoxine and live yeast cell derivative.) 3. One comment requested that the agency include all available transcriptsof the Panel's meetings in the administrative record. The agency does not ordinarily include transcripts of panel meetings inthe administrative record. The reasons for this are stated in the preambleto the ``Proposal to Designate the Contents and the Time of Closing ofthe Administrative Record,'' published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of June 4, 1974 (39 FR 19878). (The final rulewas published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of November 8, 1974 (39 FR 39556).) Any commentsrelating to transcripts of panel meetings should state the reasons thatwould warrant the agency's consideration of the transcripts or particularportions of the transcripts, notwithstanding the reasons given by the agencyfor not ordinarily considering them. The comment did not state any reasons;therefore, the agency is not including the transcripts of the Panel's meetingsin the administrative record. 4. Murray Berdick, Ph. D., commented that his name was omitted from thelist of individuals who appeared before the Panel (45 FR 35577). He statedthat his presentation is included in the transcript of the Panel's April29, 1977 meeting and is cited as reference 12 at 45 FR 35627. He also indicatedthat his name was incorrectly spelled at 45 FR 35635, column 2, reference6. The agency regrets that Dr. Berdick's name was omitted from the list ofpersons who appeared before the Panel and was incorrectly spelled in thecited reference at 45 FR 35635. 5. One comment stated that the Thornton and Minor Clinic and Hospital andthe McCleary Hospital of Kansas City, Missouri, were not mentioned in thePanel's overview of the history of anorectal diseases and their treatment(45 FR 35581). The comment added that the Clinic specializes in the researchand treatment of anorectal disorders and included an account of its history.The agency appreciates the comment's pointing out these omissions fromthe Panel's report. However, the historical discussion of anorectal diseasesand their treatment was included as background in the Panel's report andwas not intended to be all-inclusive. 6. One comment pointed out that the correct citation at 45 FR 35627 fordata submitted in support of the barrier effect of protectants should havebeen Reference 9, OTC Volume 120052, not Reference 6, which is ``Remington'sPractice of Pharmacy.'' Another comment stated that a protocol for a productcontaining dibucaine apparently was erroneously attributed to Ciba-Geigyin the administrative record and that this firm did not submit this protocol.The agency acknowledges that Reference 6 at 45 FR 35627 should have beenidentified as OTC Volume 120052. The protocol erroneously attributed toCiba-Geigy should have been attributed to Myer Laboratories. 7. One comment argued that publication of a call-for-data notice in the<T4>Federal Register </T4>amounted to inadequate notice to manufacturersof hemorrhoidal drug products and discriminated against the smaller manufactureror packager who, with only a small support staff, may not have the resourcesto employ an individual to read the <T4>Federal Register </T4>every day. The comment stated that its marketedhemorrhoidal preparation containing ephedrine alkaloid and 8-hydroxyquinolinewas not submitted to the Panel for review because of this lack of notice.Consequently, these ingredients were not reviewed by the Panel and wouldbecome Category II in a final rule. The comment objected to such a CategoryII classification for these ingredients, adding that the rectal preparationin which they are combined has been used successfully for over 20 years.In addition to the call-for-data notice (38 FR 10307), the agency regularlypublished notices in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>announcing the dates of the Panel's meetingsand the part of each meeting that was open to the public. The minutes ofeach meeting were made publicly available, and the industry liaisons, whoserved on the Hemorrhoidal Panel as nonvoting members, were nominated byThe Proprietary Association, the national trade association of OTC drugmanufacturers. In addition, the OTC drug review has been highly publicized,and the Panel's review of anorectal drug products covered a period of over4 years. For these reasons, the agency believes that adequate opportunity was providedfor all parties to present their positions to the Panel. Ample opportunitieshave existed and continue to exist for all interested persons to expresstheir opinions before publication of the final rule. For example, interestedpersons could have submitted comments and data during the comment periodfollowing publication of the Panel's report and may do so again followingpublication of the tentative final monograph. (See andSection; 330.10(a)(6) and (7).) The comment did not submit any data to support the safety and effectivenessof ephedrine alkaloid or 8-hydroxyquinoline used in anorectal drug products.Therefore, the agency has no basis for classifying these ingredients inthis tentative final monograph. As stated above, additional data may besubmitted for 12 months following publication of this tentative final monograph.8. One comment contended that the Panel failed to evaluate or discuss twoclinical studies submitted to show that its proposed product (an aerosolmedicated anal wipe foam) was significantly effective for relief of painand itching in persons with anorectal disease (Refs. 1 and 2). Referringto the statement at 45 FR 35590 that ``the need to produce a foam for deliveringthe active ingredient is not clear to the Panel,'' the comment contendedthat the Panel failed to perceive that all foams are not ``shaving lather-type''foams. The comment stated that its anhydrous foam is a ``quick-breaking''type of foam and serves only as a delivery vehicle. As the foam is appliedto the toilet tissue it breaks and leaves a local anesthetic suspension,while the emollients and other ingredients are left in solution for skinapplication. Although not referred to in the Panel's general statement on foams, thedata submitted by the comment were reviewed by the Panel and referred toin the discussion of testing guidelines at 43 FR 35595. The Panel alsodiscussed the use of foam products for delivering an active ingredientexternally in the anal canal and in the lower rectum below the dentateline (43 FR 35589 and 35590). Because the agency is not proposing the Panel'srequirement for final formulation testing in this tentative final monograph,Category I anorectal ingredients can be formulated in any dosage form forexternal use, including foams, provided the product meets each conditionof the final monograph. (See comment 55 below.) However, the proposed product to which the comment referred would haveanesthetic, counterirritant, emollient, and/or antipruritic properties(Ref. 1). The Panel concluded that it is not rational to combine a localanesthetic and a counterirritant and placed such combinations in CategoryII.The agency concurs. Thus, the comment's proposed product would be considereda Category II combination. (See comment 34 below.) <ITAG tagnum="74">References </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) OTC Volume 120035. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) OTC Volume 120037. </ITAG>B. Comments on Local Anesthetics 9. One comment supported the opinion of the Panel minority that local anestheticsin anorectal drug products should be Category I for intrarectal use insteadof Category III, as recommended by the Panel majority. The comment citedthe minority's reasoning that, even without double-blind studies, the effectivenessof local anesthetic-containing anorectal drug products that are used intrarectallyis supported by marketing records of repeat sales, use experience, andPanel members' clinical experience with patients who claimed relief ofdiscomfort after intrarectal use of these products. The agency has thoroughly considered the issue of intrarectal (internal)use of local anesthetics and finds that, at present, there is insufficientevidence of general recognition of the safety and effectiveness of thisuse of local anesthetics. The lack of general recognition is demonstratedby the fact that the Panel was not unanimous in its recommendations. The Panel majority pointed out that there are no known sensory pain fibersabove the dentate line (45 FR 35607). Hence, the majority concluded thatthere is insufficient evidence to prove that local anesthetics used intrarectallyare effective. In addition, the Panel majority felt that local anestheticscan easily diffuse through mucous membranes and, when applied intrarectallycan be absorbed directly into the systemic, central, and portal blood circulationsalmost as rapidly, under certain conditions, as intravenous administration.Thus, these drugs raise potential safety questions and could cause severereactions in certain individuals. After reviewing the available scientific evidence, the Panel concludedthat certain local anesthetics, i.e., benzocaine, benzyl alcohol, dyclonine,and pramoxine, could be used safely intrarectally but that data were stillneeded to establish effectiveness. (See 45 FR 35613 to 35619.) The Panel minority believed that the majority based its conclusion on thefact that there are no anatomically identifiable sensory nerve endingsor nerve fibers in the rectal mucosa or submucosa. However, the minorityargued that there are known and identifiable nerve fibers and plexusesbetween the muscular layers that are associated with peristaltic muscularcontraction of the rectum. The minority concluded that these nerve fibers,which are known to innervate the smooth musculature of the rectum, havesynapses with cells in the myenteric and submucosal plexuses. In addition,the fibers have or are in adjacent association with sensory conductingnerve fibers, which transmit impulses to the central nervous system. The minority argued that, although electrical stimulation or applicationof a mustard suspension to the rectal mucosa has not been shown to evokea pain response in healthy mucosa, pain perception may result when bloodvessels supplied with sensory pain fibers become diseased with hemorrhoids.However, evidence based on well-controlled clinical studies is lackingto support this argument. In addition, both the majority and minority ofthe Panel discussed the fact that some sensation of pressure can be producedin the rectum by distention due to feces or gas (45 FR 35607 to 35608).The agency is not aware of evidence that the source or sources of thissensation are also capable of transmitting the sensations of pain or itching.Finally, in support of intrarectal use of local anesthetics, both the commentand the Panel minority cited marketing records of repeat sales of productscontaining local anesthetics for intrarectal use. They also cited use experience,particularly that of Panel members' patients who claimed relief of anorectaldiscomfort after use of these products. The agency recognizes that proofof effectiveness may not always consist of controlled clinical investigations.In fact, the OTC drug review regulations in 21 CFR 330.10(a)(4)(ii) providethat investigations may be corroborated by partially controlled or uncontrolledstudies, documented clinical studies by qualified experts, and reportsof significant human experience during marketing. However, after carefullyreviewing all the available literature, the agency agrees with the Panelmajority (45 FR 35607) that the intrarectal effectiveness of all localanesthetics remains unsubstantiated and requires further study. (See alsocomment 11 below.) However, the agency emphasizes that this decision doesnot affect the external use of these ingredients. OTC anorectal anestheticsare being included in the tentative final monograph with appropriate labelingfor external use only. The agency invites public comment and submission of data on the safetyand effectiveness of OTC anorectal anesthetic drugs for intrarectal use.Pending receipt and review of such data and information, the agency proposesthat the intrarectal use of OTC anorectal anesthetic ingredients be considereda Category III condition except for those ingredients or conditions thatare proposed as Category II.10. One comment stated that the Panel's recommended monograph refers todibucaine base and dibucaine hydrochloride, but that only dibucaine baseis presently available in formulations intended for anorectal use. In addition to the data submitted on dibucaine base, the Panel chose toreview the hydrochloride salt, noting that the base is slightly water solubleand moderately lipid soluble, whereas the hydrochloride salt is solublein water and in organic solvents (45 FR 35614). The Panel considered dibucainebase and dibucaine hydrochloride as pharmacologically equivalent, and theagency concurs. Dibucaine base and dibucaine hydrochloride were classifiedby the Panel as Category III for external and intrarectal use (45 FR 35614)and therefore were not included in the Panel's recommended monograph. However,as discussed in comment 12 below, the agency is proposing Category I statusin this tentative final monograph for dibucaine base and dibucaine hydrochloridefor external use. Intrarectal use of these ingredients is Category III.(See comment 9 above and comment 11 below.) 11. One comment submitted summaries of six studies (Ref. 1) and requestedthat dibucaine be classified Category I as a local anesthetic for intrarectaluse. Noting that these same summaries had been submitted to the Panel (Ref.2), the comment stated that the Panel apparently found the results presentedin these summaries to be insufficient to demonstrate the effectivenessof dibucaine for intrarectal use. The comment added that, although thedata generated by these studies do not demonstrate statistical significancein all parameters, it believes that dibucaine has been shown in the clinicalpractice setting to be effective in the relief of hemorrhoidal symptoms.The comment pointed out that the studies had been reviewed by other authoritieswho found that the studies, as a whole, demonstrate the effectiveness ofdibucaine used intrarectally (Refs. 3 and 4). The comment subsequentlysubmitted additional effectiveness data (Ref. 5). In addition, the comment disputed the Panel's conclusion that dibucainehad not been shown to be safe for intrarectal use because of possible systemictoxicity when administered intrarectally. Contending that further safetydata are not needed, the comment stated that studies in which dogs andmonkeys were administered high doses of dibucaine intrarectally did notshow serum levels as high as those of dibucaine administered intravenously.The comment added that lipid vehicles retard the rate and extent of absorptionof local anesthetics, that marketing history and submitted studies attestto dibucaine's safety when used intrarectally, and that further testingof humans using high doses of dibucaine would be unethical. The agency has evaluated the summaries submitted by the comment (Ref. 2)and the additional effectiveness data (Ref. 5). The same summaries weresubmitted to the Panel on April 27, 1977 (Ref. 2). Other data and informationon these studies including the opinions of the other authorities mentionedby the comment had also been submitted to the Panel on June 22, 1973 (Ref.4) and on July 29, 1974 (Ref. 3). The Panel reviewed all of these data,plus other data, and concluded that the effectiveness of local anesthetics,including dibucaine, for intrarectal use is unproven (45 FR 35616). Theagency concurs with that determination. The additional effectiveness data involved a randomized, double-blind comparisonin 143 patients of an ointment containing dibucaine base and the ointmentbase minus dibucaine for relief of pain, burning, and/or itching associatedwith internal, external, or mixed hemorrhoids (Ref. 5). (The summary ofthis study had been reviewed by the Panel (Ref. 2).) Only 127 cases weresuitable for analysis; 65 patients received the ointment containing dibucainebase while 62 patients received the ointment base without dibucaine. Despiteseveral problems in evaluation, including heterogeneous disease processesof external hemorrhoids, internal hemorrhoids, and mixed hemorrhoids, andvariable patient medication compliance, and despite probable contributionfrom the ointment vehicle base, the ointment containing dibucaine basewas shown in this study to be superior to the ointment base in seven ofthe measurements for which there was significance at the 5-percent levelor greater; this leaves two measurements where the ointment base was judgedsuperior at the same level of significance. Only 15 patients who received the ointment containing dibucaine base and14 patients who received the vehicle alone had internal hemorrhoids. Therest of the patients had either external hemorrhoids or mixed hemorrhoids(50 patients who received the ointment containing dibucaine base and 48patients who received the vehicle control). In about 75 percent of the cases there were external complaints (externalto the dentate line) and in about 25 percent of the cases complaints werejudged to be as a result of internal hemorrhoids. However, the data areanalyzed only for the entire group, with no analysis exclusively for thosepatients with internal hemorrhoids. Further, the agency believes such ananalysis would not be meaningful because it would involve 29 patients derivedfrom 9 investigators or about 3 cases per investigator. There are insufficient data to establish that the ointment containing dibucainebase is effective for the relief of pain, burning, discomfort, and itchingassociated with internal hemorrhoids. The safety of internal applicationalso has to be established for dibucaine base. The agency's detailed commentsand evaluation of the data are on file in the Dockets Management Branch(Ref. 6).<ITAG tagnum="74">References </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Comment No. C00008, Docket No. 80N-0050, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) OTC Volume 120064. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) OTC Volume 120023. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) OTC Volume 120010. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Comment No. SUP002, Docket No. 80N-0050, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Letter from W. E. Gilbertson, FDA, to R. Gauch, Ciba-Geigy Corp.,coded LET011, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG>12. Disputing the Panel's statement at 45 FR 35616 that ``there are nostudies using dibucaine in the perianal area,'' one comment cited dataon a controlled study that had been submitted to the Panel. The study involvedapproximately 45 patients with external hemorrhoids and 65 patients withboth internal and external hemorrhoids (Ref. 1). The comment argued thatthe Panel placed pramoxine in Category I for external use based on datafrom two uncontrolled studies and placed benzocaine in Category I for externaluse based on one unblinded, nonrandomized study that used only 13 patients.The comment stated that the Panel either used different standards in determiningthe effectiveness of dibucaine than it used for pramoxine and benzocaineor discounted or ignored the ``superior'' data submitted for dibucaine.Contending that proof of dibucaine's effectiveness as a local anestheticneed not relate solely to its use in the perianal area, the comment pointedout that the Advisory Review Panel on OTC Topical Analgesic, Antirheumatic,Otic, Burn, and Sunburn Prevention and Treatment Drug Products (TopicalAnalgesic Panel) classified dibucaine in Category I for external use for``the temporary relief of pain and itching due to * * * minor cuts, abrasions* * *, and minor skin irritations.'' The comment added that the HemorrhoidalPanel stated that dibucaine is probably effective on abraded skin of theperianal area, and that the Topical Analgesic Panel found dibucaine tobe effective on abraded skin generally. The comment further contended thatabraded skin is abraded skin regardless of its location and that thereis no justification for categorizing dibucaine as anything less than CategoryI for use on perianal skin. The comment urged the agency to consider thefact that many patients over the years have obtained relief using dibucaineand that, for all of the above reasons, a Category I classification ofdibucaine as a local anesthetic for external use in anorectal disease iswarranted. Although the comment requested Category I status specifically for dibucaine,the agency notes that the Panel considered dibucaine (base) and dibucainehydrochloride to be pharmacologically equivalent (see comment 10 above);therefore, this discussion on external use applies to both ingredients.(The intrarectal use of local anesthetics is discussed in comment 9 above.)The Panel reviewed the data referred to by the comment and applied thesame standards in reaching its conclusions on benzocaine, dibucaine, dibucainehydrochloride, and pramoxine hydrochloride (45 FR 35609 to 35610 and 35614to 35617), namely that the effectiveness of an OTC anorectal active ingredientshould be demonstrated in the vehicle in which it would be marketed andthat the final formulation should be tested in the anorectal area. ThePanel concluded that adequate data were submitted to permit classificationof benzocaine and pramoxine hydrochloride in specific vehicles in CategoryI for external use. However, although the data submitted to the Panel containedstudies using final formulations of dibucaine, the Panel concluded thatbecause of the lack of studies on perianal skin the data were not sufficientto establish the effectiveness of dibucaine for external use for relievinganorectal conditions (45 FR 35616). In the tentative final monograph for OTC external analgesic drug products,published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of February 8, 1983 (48 FR 5852), the agencytentatively adopted the recommendations of the Topical Analgesic Paneland proposed that dibucaine and dibucaine hydrochloride in concentrationsof 0.25 to 1 percent be generally recognized as safe and effective forexternal use. Having reviewed both Panels' recommendations, the agencybelieves that the data on dibucaine and dibucaine hydrochloride show thatthese ingredients when applied to the skin of the perianal area and analcanal are as safe and effective as when used on the skin of other areasof the body. Therefore, in this tentative final monograph the agency isproposing dibucaine and dibucaine hydrochloride as Category I for externaluse. The agency notes that the Hemorrhoidal Panel's recommended dosage rangefor dibucaine and dibucaine hydrochloride was 2.5 milligrams (mg) to 20mg per dosage unit. The minimum effective dose of 2.5 mg per dosage unitwas based on the amount of dibucaine in a marketed suppository for intrarectaluse, for which data were submitted to the Panel. The maximum safe doseof 20 mg per dosage unit was based on the amount of the ingredient containedin a 2-gram (g) dose of a 1-percent ointment for external and intrarectaluse, for which data were also submitted to the Panel. The agency notesthat the 2.5-mg suppository dosage form is no longer marketed and is unawareof any other currently marketed product that contains 2.5 mg dibucaineper dosage unit. The 1-percent ointment is still marketed. Therefore, theagency is proposing that the dosage of dibucaine and dibucaine hydrochloridefor external use be expressed in a concentration range of 0.25 to 1 percentfor use up to 3 or 4 times daily, which is consistent with the tentativefinal monograph for OTC external analgesic drug products (48 FR 5852).In addition, because the agency did not propose any limitation on the maximumsafe daily dose of this ingredient for topical use in the external analgesictentative final monograph, and because the Panel's recommended limitationon the maximum daily dose of dibucaine was based on the potential safetyconcerns resulting from intrarectal application, the agency is not proposingthe 80-mg maximum daily dose limitation recommended by the HemorrhoidalPanel for dibucaine and dibucaine hydrochloride. <ITAG tagnum="74">Reference </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) OTC Volume 120064, pp. 6, 7, 10, 19-21, 31-33, and 50-57.</ITAG>13. One comment supported the Panel's interim decision, made at its 7thand 16th meetings, to place diperodon (0.5 to 1 percent) in Category Ifor external use. The comment contended that the Panel's decision duringits 28th meeting to place diperodon in Category III was based largely ondouble-blind studies showing that diperodon was only slighty more effectivethan placebo. The comment disputed the Panel's final recommendation toplace diperodon in Category II for external use and cited a study to supportthe effectiveness of diperodon (Ref. 1). The comment also cited the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of June 18, 1971, in which the comment statedthat FDA published the findings of the National Academy of Sciences-NationalResearch Council's (NAS-NRC) Drug Efficacy Study Group that diperodon waspossibly effective for the temporary relief of anorectal pain and itching,as well as for anesthetic and mild antiseptic action. The comment statedthat safety is not at issue and contended that the difference in scientificopinion as to diperodon's effectiveness should not result in its placementin Category II.During the course of the Panel's deliberations the classification of diperodonwas tentative; however, with the publication of its recommendations inthe <T4>Federal Register</T4>, the Panel's final classification of diperodonwas as follows: Category II for external use and Category III for intrarectaluse. Only the external use of diperodon is discussed in this response.The intrarectal use of local anesthetic ingredients is discussed elsewherein this document. (See comment 9 above.) After reviewing the data submitted to the Panel and the references citedby the comment, the agency concludes that diperodon can be reclassifiedfrom Category II to Category III for external anorectal use but that thedata remain inadequate to reclassify it into Category I. The published study (Ref. 1) and the June 18, 1971 <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice describing the NAS-NRC report, which werereferenced by the comment, and an unpublished study in humans (Ref. 2)were evaluated and cited by the Panel in its discussion of the effectivenessof diperodon for external use (45 FR 35612). The Panel concluded that diperodonwas not effective for OTC external anorectal use because the predominantresults of the studies show no statistical difference between diperodonand placebo. With respect to the published study (Ref. 1), although the investigatorsconcluded that diperodon was effective as a topical anesthetic in thisdermal abrasion study in the guinea pig, there is a lack of evidence thatdiperodon produces clinically significant topical anesthetic action inhumans. In the unpublished study, 43 patients were randomized to receive an ointmentcontaining diperodon or placebo in double-blind fashion on the day followinganorectal surgery (Ref. 2). The patients evaluated the degree of pain (none,mild, moderate, severe) on the morning of the first post-operative dayjust prior to application of the test product (baseline) and again at 10,20, 40, and 60 minutes following ointment application. The agency has analyzedthe pain score data and concludes that the response at 40 and 60 minutesfavored the diperodon-containing ointment, although differences did notachieve statistical significance at the conventional 0.05 level. Results of four other controlled studies of the ointment containing diperodonthat were submitted to the Panel (Ref. 3) failed to confirm the positiveresults of the above unpublished study (Ref. 2). Two of these studies weresimilar in design to the unpublished study discussed above and involvedmore patients; however, all of these studies failed to show a significantdrug effect. Without independent replication of the findings in the unpublishedstudy (Ref. 2), it is difficult to draw definitive conclusions concerningthe effectiveness of diperodon as a topical anesthetic. Although the evidence of the effectiveness of diperodon as a local anestheticis conflicting, some of the data are suggestive of effectiveness. Therefore,the agency is upgrading diperodon as a local anesthetic for external anorectaluse from Category II to Category III. Additional data are needed beforethe effectiveness of diperodon for external anorectal use can be established.The agency's detailed comments and evaluation of the data are on file inthe Dockets Management Branch (Ref. 4). <ITAG tagnum="74">References </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Campbell, A.H. et al., ``In Vivo Evaluation of Local AnestheticsApplied Topically,'' <T3>Journal of Pharmaceutical Sciences, </T3>57:2045-2048, 1968. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Lieberman, W., Protocol 039-WL-001, OTC Volume 120075. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) OTC Volume 120075. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Letter from W.E. Gilbertson, FDA, to J.P. Tierney, Counsel forThornton-Minor McCleary Ointment Co., coded LET009, Docket No. 80N-0050,Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG>14. One comment requested that the Panel's recommendations in andSection;346.10(b) for a cream or jelly formulation for pramoxine hydrochloridebe expanded to include ointments and aqueous vehicles. The comment statedthat the rate-limiting step in drug absorption in the anorectal area isthe rate of release of the dissolved drug from the melted base. With asalt such as pramoxine hydrochloride, the rate of release would be increasedby using a lipid base because the salt would be released rapidly from lipidto water and be available for treating the affected area. This commentalso stated that if the intrarectal use of local anesthetics is classifiedin Category III, the suppository dosage form of pramoxine hydrochlorideshould also be included in Category III. Two comments requested that the monograph include an aerosol foam dosageform of pramoxine hydrochloride. Noting that the Panel stated that theneed for a foam anorectal dosage form was unclear, one of the commentsargued that the agency established the need and rationale for this dosageform by approving as safe and effective two prescription anorectal drugproducts containing a steroid in an aerosol foam. The comment submitteddata to show that the mucoadhesive properties of the aerosol foam product,discussed by the Panel at 45 FR 35590, provide a rapid and complete coverageof the rectal mucosa compared with the slow and incomplete coverage providedby a conventional suppository (Ref. 1). The submissions on pramoxine hydrochloride presented to the Panel includedinformation on various dosage forms (45 FR 35590, 35610, and 35611); however,only one submission for jelly and cream dosage forms contained completeinformation as to the content of the final formulation, i.e., inactiveingredients (Ref. 2). Because the Panel concluded that the final formulationof anorectal products must be tested for safety and effectiveness (45 FR35588) and because the only data submitted which identified the completefinal formulation were for a cream and a jelly (Ref. 2), it placed onlythose dosage forms and the specific ingredients contained in the marketedformulations in its recommended monograph. Nevertheless, after reviewingthe submitted data for all dosage forms, including those which did notspecifically identify the inactive ingredients in the final formulations,the Panel stated that no toxic effects were noted in the clinical use ofpramoxine hydrochloride as an aerosol foam, in suppositories, and in othervehicles including ointments and solutions (45 FR 35610 and Ref. 3).Regarding the use of an aerosol foam, the Panel stated that the need toproduce a foam for delivering the active ingredient was not clear (45 FR35590) and that a properly designed ointment applicator should serve thesame purpose as a foam delivery system. However, the Panel also statedthat it did not intend to restrict ingenuity in product design as longas the product accomplishes the claimed effect and met the same final formulationrequirements of safety and effectiveness as any other dosage form. Theagency is aware that topical aerosol foam products containing pramoxinehydrochloride 1 percent labeled for anorectal use have been marketed OTCfor a number of years (Refs. 4 and 5). Accordingly, based on the safetyof this ingredient for external anorectal use and the knowledge that anaerosol foam is an effective delivery system for external anorectal use,the agency finds a topical aerosol foam dosage form of pramoxine hydrochlorideacceptable for OTC use. Likewise, based on the history of many anorectaldrug products being marketed in ointment dosage forms and the data submittedto the Panel (Ref. 2), the agency believes that an ointment vehicle wouldbe acceptable for pramoxine hydrochloride when used externally. Suppositories containing pramoxine hydrochloride, however, would not beacceptable dosage forms at this time because of insufficient data to establishthe effectiveness of local anesthetics when used intrarectally. (See comment9 above.) There is a lack of experience with formulations of this drugand similar anorectal drugs in aqueous vehicles. The Panel stated thatan aqueous solution of pramoxine hydrochloride is not useful in anorectalproducts because the ingredient will not remain at the site of action (45FR 35611). As discussed in comment 55 below, specific dosage forms or specific formulationsfor anorectal active ingredients are not identified in this tentative finalmonograph. Thus, in formulating anorectal drug products containing pramoxinehydrochloride, manufacturers should assure that the vehicle is safe andsuitable for anorectal use and that the active ingredient will be properlyreleased from the formulation. <ITAG tagnum="74">References </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Comment No. C00015, Docket No. 80N-0050, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) OTC Volume 120084. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) OTC Volume 120015. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) OTC Volume 120039. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) OTC Volume 120050. </ITAG>C. Comments on Vasoconstrictors 15. One comment questioned whether the Panel's Category I recommendationfor ephedrine sulfate and phenylephrine hydrochloride ``in aqueous solution''for external and intrarectal use could be interpreted to mean that theingredients could be dissolved in the aqueous phase of either an oil-in-wateror water-in-oil emulsion vehicle. The data reviewed by the Panel primarily focused on aqueous solutions ofephedrine sulfate and phenylephrine hydrochloride (45 FR 35622 and 35624).Because of the Panel's concerns about the need for final formulation testingto support safety and effectiveness, the agency believes that the Panelfelt that these ingredients had only been determined to be effective whenpresent in an aqueous solution. The agency is not proposing the Panel'srecommendation for final formulation testing, and therefore specific vehicles(e.g., oil-in-water or water-in-oil emulsions) for anorectal active ingredientsare not being identified in this tentative final monograph. (See comment55 below.) Thus, in formulating anorectal drug products containing ephedrinesulfate or phenylephrine hydrochloride, manufacturers should assure thatthe vehicle is appropriate for anorectal use and that the active ingredientwill be properly released from the formulation. Manufacturers should beaware that the newness of a dosage, or method * * * of administration orapplication, or other condition of use * * * may affect the ``newness''of a drug. (See 21 CFR 310.3(h)(5).) 16. One comment maintained that statements made by the Panel concerningformulations containing ephedrine sulfate are contradictory. The commentnoted that the Panel stated at 45 FR 35587 that water-soluble, oil-insolublesalts, such as ephedrine sulfate, are preferred for rapid absorption froma fat-type base, such as cocoa butter, but that the Panel stated at 45FR 35622 that ephedrine sulfate is Category I only in an aqueous solution.In discussing the effectiveness of ephedrine sulfate, the Panel statedthat incorporation of ephedrine sulfate in an ointment appears reasonableto provide better surface contact and greater effectiveness. However, thePanel noted that neither a literature survey nor a review of the submitteddata provided effectiveness studies on the formulation of ephedrine sulfatein an ointment (45 FR 35623). The Panel recommended that ephedrine sulfatebe formulated only in an aqueous solution, as this formulation was theonly one containing ephedrine sulfate of which the Panel was aware (45FR 35622). However, because the agency is not proposing the Panel's recommendationfor final formulation testing, specific vehicles for anorectal active ingredients,including ephedrine sulfate, are not identified in this tentative finalmonograph. Thus, anorectal active ingredients may be formulated in anysafe and suitable vehicle. (See comment 55 below.) D. Comments on Protectants 17. One comment requested that hydrogenated vegetable oils and waxes beincluded as Category I anorectal protectants. Another comment requestedthat semisynthetic bases, such as those derived from coconut oil or mixturesof triglycerides of fatty acids, be recognized as Category I anorectalprotectants. The Panel did not review these substances because no data on them weresubmitted. The comments did not submit any data to support their requests,nor is the agency aware of any data on these substances when used as anorectalprotectant active ingredients. The agency therefore lacks sufficient datafor Category I status for these substances at this time. 18. One comment stated that the Panel did not discuss palm kernel oil asa protectant and suppository base, nor did it evaluate two submissionsthat it received on this ingredient (Refs. 1 and 2). The comment addedthat the Panel failed to use its expertise to evaluate and designate palmkernel oil as a ``protectant vehicle'' when the only use of this ingredientthat it mentioned was as an inactive ingredient (45 FR 35580). The commentstated that palm kernel oil is combined with other nonirritating oils,such as coconut oil, for use as an ointment base or a suppository baseand has been used as a ``protectant vehicle'' in a therapeutic formulationfor the treatment of psoriasis and eczema. The comment referred to publishedstudies on the safety of hydrogenated palm kernel oil as a suppositorybase and on the rate of release of pharmacologically active ingredientsfrom palm kernel oil ointment bases. The comment stated that the wide useof this protectant ingredient, in addition to the data, attests to itssafety for human use topically and internally. The comment provided a bibliographicallisting of 17 references to support its statements and copies of 9 of thesereferences (Ref. 3).The agency has reviewed the submissions cited by the comment and the ninereferences provided and concludes that the data are inadequate to supportthe classification of palm kernel oil as a Category I protectant for anorectaluse. However, it should be noted that this nonmonograph classificationand the Panel's classification of palm kernel oil is an inactive ingredientdo not prevent its use in an ointment or suppository base. One of the submissions referred to by the comment was a letter to the Paneldescribing a marketed suppository containing a combination of two suppositorybases in approximately equal amounts (Ref. 1). The letter also stated thatthe bases were synthetic triglycerides derived from coconut or palm kerneloil and requested that the Panel include coconut oil and palm kernel oilin its list of pharmaceutical necessities (inactive ingredients). Accordingly,the Panel added these ingredients to its list of pharmaceutical necessitiesas ``coconut oil (palm kernel oil)'' (45 FR 35580). The letter did notmention the use of coconut oil or palm kernel oil as protectants. Subsequently, on May 14, 1975, another submission was made to the Panelby the same manufacturer on its ointment and suppository products (Ref.2). The submission lists the ingredients of an anorectal ointment and suppository,including the suppository bases described in the letter above. The submissiondid not make a specific request that these ingredients be considered asprotectants nor was any information provided in the submission on the safetyand effectiveness of coconut oil or palm kernel oil as protectants. As mentioned above, the comment provided copies of 9 of the 17 referencesthat it cited. The other 8 references appear to have been published inforeign languages, and the agency has been able to obtain a complete translationfor only one of these references (Ref. 4). The data contained in the availablereferences provide general information as to the fatty acid content ofthe oil, manufacturing processes, chemical and physical properties, anduse of the oil in soaps (Refs. 5 through 12).Golucki (Ref. 4) studied theliberation rate of citric acid and salicylic acid from palm kernel oilointments. These references relate to safety, but do not support the effectivenessof palm kernel oil as a protectant. Interested persons may submit additionaldata to establish the effectiveness of palm kernel oil as a protectantduring the comment period following the publication of this tentative finalmonograph. Any data received will be evaluated and addressed in the finalrule. The agency's detailed comments and evaluation of the submissions and thereferences cited by the comment are on file in the Dockets Management Branch(Ref. 13). <ITAG tagnum="74">References </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Letter submitted by Bristol-Myers Products, dated June 17, 1974,to T. DeCillis, FDA, in OTC Volume 12APA3, Docket No. 80N-0050, DocketsManagement Branch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) OTC Volume 120031. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Comment No. C00014 and Report No. RPT, Docket No. 80N-0050, DocketsManagement Branch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Golucki, Z. ``The Relationship Between the Concentration of aPharmacologically Active Substance and the Rate of Its Liberation FromOintment Base,'' <T3>Dissertationes Pharmaceuticae et Pharmacologicae, </T3>23:83-87, 1971.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Myddleton, W.W., ``Cosmetic Materials. Their Origin, Characteristics,Uses and Dermatological Action,'' Vol. II, ``The Principles and Practiceof Modern Cosmetics,'' Chemical Publishing Co., Inc., New York, p. 315,1963. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Balsam, M.S., and E. Sagarin, ``Cosmetics. Science and Technology,''2d Ed., Wiley-Interscience, New York, p. 8, 1972. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Dreger, E. E., and J. Ross, United States Patent No. 2,462,831(abstract), assigned to Colgate-Palmolive-Peet Co., March 1, 1949. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) Wade, A., editor, ``Martindale. The Extra Pharmacopoeia,'' 27thEd., The Pharmaceutical Press, London, pp. 1049-1050, 1977. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9) ``British Pharmacopoeia_1973,'' 10th Ed., Medicines Commission,London, pp. 339-340, 1973.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(10) Allen, A., G.H. Padley, and G.R. Whalley, ``The Fatty Acid Compositionof Some Soapmaking Fats and Oils, Part 2. Coconut and Palm Kernel Oils,''<T3>Soap, Perfume, Cosmetics, </T3>42:372, 374, 376, 378, and 380, 1969.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(11) Cornelius, J.A., ``Palm Oil and Palm Kernel Oil,'' <T3>Progress in the Chemistry of Fats and Other Lipids, </T3>15:5-27, 1977.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(12) Szczepanska, H., H. Grynberg, and Z. Elsner, ``Some Interdependenceof Physicochemical and Pharmaceutical Properties of Fats,'' <T3>Fette-Seifen-Anstrichmittel, </T3>22:68-71, 1970. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(13) Letter from W.E. Gilbertson, FDA, to W.B. Elvers, Bristol MyersProducts, coded LET007, Docket No. 80N-0050, Dockets Management Branch.</ITAG>19. One comment requested that the advance notice of proposed rulemakingbe amended to include cocoa butter substitutes derived from natural foodgrade coconut and/or palm kernel oils as Category I protectants. Statingthat cocoa butter substitutes are currently marketed in OTC anorectal drugproducts and are more readily available and less costly than cocoa butter,the comment submitted excerpts from pharmaceutical compendia in supportof this statement (Refs. 1, 2, and 3). The comment added that cocoa buttersubstitutes, sometimes referred to in labeling as bland hydrogenated vegetableoil base (''Adeps Solidus''), are contained in suppository products submittedto the Hemorrhoidal Panel, but did not specify any submitted products ascontaining these ingredients. The comment subsequently submitted copiesof an unpublished clinical study (Ref. 4), a published clinical study (Ref.5), and results of a Draize eye test (Ref. 6). The agency considered the comment's request as a petition to reopen theadministrative record and included the new data and information on cocoabutter substitutes. Subsequently, the agency evaluated these data and informationand determined that they relate only to safety and do not address effectiveness.In addition, the composition of cocoa butter substitutes was not defined,nor was a use concentration established. Lacking specific data to showcomposition and use concentration of cocoa butter substitutes, the agencycannot evaluate the safety and effectiveness of these ingredients and thuscannot consider them as Category I anorectal protectants. The compendial references provide general information that describes cocoabutter substitutes as suppository bases (Refs. 1 and 2) or describes physicalcharacteristics of these ingredients, such as melting points, compatibility,etc. (Ref. 3). While these data relate to the safety of cocoa butter substitutes,they do not address the effectiveness of these ingredients as anorectalprotectants or adequately define their composition or the optimum concentrationfor anorectal protectant use. The unpublished clinical study states that100 cases were studied, but does not mention the ingredient content ofthe suppositories that were used (Ref. 4). The published study discussesthe use of ``Adeps solidus'' and ``oleum cacao'' as ``suppository compositions''in young dogs and reports no inflammatory reactions (Ref. 5). The resultsof the Draize eye test showed that a formulation described as ``WITEPSOLS58017'' can be safely used as a medium for vaginal application of medications,but did not disclose the ingredient content of this formulation. The dataare inadequate to establish general recognition of the safety and effectivenessof these ingredients as anorectal protectants. The agency's detailed comments and evaluations of the above data are onfile in the Dockets Management Branch (Ref. 7). In response to the agency'scomments, the firm submitted two additional studies on WITEPSOL (Refs.8 and 9) and a protocol to evaluate cocoa butter substitutes as anorectalprotectants (Ref. 10). One study (Ref. 8) compared WITEPSOL to severalsubstances to determine skin irritancy while the other study (Ref. 9) discussedthe use of WITEPSOL as a suppository vehicle for the delivery of preanestheticmedication in young children. These data are also inadequate to supportthe effectiveness of WITEPSOL as an anorectal protectant. The agency'sdetailed comments and evaluations of these data (Ref. 11) and of the protocol(Ref. 12) are also on file in the Dockets Management Branch. In responseto the agency's comments, the firm has submitted additional information(Refs. 13 through 16). This information is currently being evaluated andwill be addressed in the final rule. As noted in comment 18 above, the Panel classified palm kernel oil as aninactive ingredient, but this classification does not prevent use of palmkernel oil as an anorectal suppository base because this is not consideredan active ingredient use. Similarly, a cocoa butter substitute derivedfrom food grade coconut oil could be used as a suppository base withoutbeing classified as a Category I anorectal active ingredient. <ITAG tagnum="74">References </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) ``United States Pharmacopeia XX_National Formulary XV,'' UnitedStates Pharmacopeial Convention, Inc., Rockville, MD, p. 1029, 1980. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Wade, A., editor, ``The Extra Pharmacopeia,'' 27th Ed., Councilof the Pharmaceutical Society of Great Britain, London, p. 1047, 1977.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) ``European Pharmacopoeia,'' Vol. III, The Council of Europe, Sainte-Ruffine,France, pp. 139-140, 1975. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Neumann, H., ``Clinical Test of the Suppository Composition ImhausenH.,'' English translation of an unpublished study, included in CP (CitizenPetition), Docket No. 80N-0050, Dockets Management Branch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Neuwald, F., and J. Meyer-Lohman, ``Comparative Test of Compatibilityof Adeps Solidus and Oleum Cacao,'' (English translation), <T3>Arzneimittelforschung, </T3>8:620-622, 1958. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) ``A Report Prepared for Dynamit Nobel, A. G., Draize Eye Test,''Consultox Laboratories LTD, London, 1970. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Letter from W. E. Gilbertson, FDA, to B. Pagliocca, Kay-Fries,Inc., coded LET008, Docket No. 80N-0050, Dockets Management Branch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) Motoyoshi, K., et al., ``Comparative Studies on the Irritancyof Oils and Synthetic Perfumes to the Skin of Rabbit, Guinea Pig, Rat,Miniature Swine and Man,'' <T3>Cosmetics andamp; Toiletries, </T3>94:41-48, 1979. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9) Shochat, S. J., J. Lewin-Epstein, and E. Superstine, ``PreanestheticSuppository for Ambulatory Children: Importance of the Base,'' <T3>Anesthesia and Analgesia; Current Researches, </T3>48:427-436, 1969.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(10) Reply Comment coded RC002, Docket No. 80N-0050, Dockets ManagementBranch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(11) Letter from W. E. Gilbertson, FDA, to V. Piermattie, Kay-Fries,Inc., coded LET012, Docket No. 80N-0050, Dockets Management Branch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(12) Letter from W. E. Gilbertson, FDA, to B. Pagliocca, Kay-Fries,Inc., coded LET013, Docket No. 80N-0050, Dockets Management Branch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(13) Letters from B. Pagliocca, Kay-Fries, Inc., to FDA, coded LET014,LET015, and LET016, Docket No. 80N-0050, Dockets Management Branch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(14) Letter from J. (Whelan) Nikitakis, CTFA, to Dr. Hulsmann, DynamitNobel Aktiengesellschaft, coded LET017, Docket No. 80N-0050, Dockets ManagementBranch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(15) Letter from B. Pagliocca, Kay-Fries, Inc., to Dr. Hulsmann, DynamitNobel Aktiengesellschaft, coded LET018, Docket No. 80N-0050, Dockets ManagementBranch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(16) Letter from Dr. Hulsmann and Mr. Heers, Dynamit Nobel Aktiengesellschaft,to J. Whelan, CTFA, coded LET019, Docket No. 80N-0050, Dockets ManagementBranch.</ITAG>20. One comment recommended that the concentration of shark liver oil belowered to 2 to 10 percent in combination with other protectants insteadof the Panel's recommended concentration of at least 50 percent per 2-gdosage unit. The comment argued that the lower concentration would allowthe combination of shark liver oil with other protectants so that the totalamount of protectants in the product would be at least 50 percent (thePanel's required concentration for making protectant claims), and the amountof vitamin A provided by daily use of the product would not exceed thePanel's recommended daily limit for anorectal use of 10,000 InternationalUnits (IU) of vitamin A. The comment referred to a presentation to thePanel showing that a particular marketed product, if labeled accordingto the Panel's recommended dosage schedule of up to six applications per24 hours, would provide 150,000 to 210,000 IU of vitamin A, or 15 to 21times the Panel's recommended maximum daily allowance of 10,000 IU (Ref.1). The comment stated that, based on the transcript of the Panel's lastmeeting, the Panel intended that the percentage of shark liver oil shouldbe reduced appropriately so that it could be formulated in combinationwith other protectants, providing a total protectant combination of atleast 50 percent without exceeding 10,000 IU of vitamin A in daily use(Ref. 2). The Panel noted that in the past, shark liver oil was required to containnot less than 16,500 IU of vitamin A and 40 IU of vitamin D per g of oil,but there is no current standard, and the concentration of vitamin A andvitamin D in shark liver oil may vary (45 FR 35634). According to the transcriptof the Panel's last meeting, each g of the shark liver oil used in theproduct described above contains 25,000 to 35,000 IU of vitamin A (Ref.2). The Panel also noted at this meeting that 16,500 IU of vitamin A isabout the lowest concentration that might be expected to occur in eachg of shark liver oil. In either case, one application of a product containingthe Panel's recommended shark liver oil concentration of at least 50 percentper 2-g dosage unit would exceed the Panel's maximum daily allowance of10,000 IU of Vitamin A. Therefore, the agency concurs that shark liveroil should be used in a concentration of less than 50 percent in anorectaldrug products. The Panel concluded that a reasonable maximum allowable concentration forsafe OTC topical use is 10,000 IU of Vitamin A and 400 IU of Vitamin Dper 24 hours (45 FR 35634). Because of this safety limitation, the agencyis not proposing a dosage as with other protectants, i.e., a contributionof at least 12.5 percent by weight. Instead, the agency is proposing inthis tentative final monograph that when shark liver oil is used in anorectaldrug products, each product is to be formulated and labeled for use upto six times daily so that the total amount of the product to be appliedover a 24-hour period contains 10,000 U.S.P. units of vitamin A and 400U.S.P. units of vitamin D (now named cholecalciferol). (One U.S.P. unitis equivalent to 1 international unit.) Thus, a single application couldcontain one-sixth of the 10,000-U.S.P. units maximum daily allowance ofvitamin A (1,666\2/3\ U.S.P. units) and one-sixth of the 400-U.S.P. unitsmaximum daily allowance of cholecalciferol (66\2/3\ U.S.P. units). Based on the above safety discussion, the agency is proposing in this tentativefinal monograph that shark liver oil for protectant use be formulated onlyin combination with other protectants. This use is consistent with themarketing history of shark liver oil in OTC anorectal drug products andallows a reasonable latitude in the formulation of such products to permita total protectant content of at least 50 percent without exposing theuser to excessive amounts of vitamin A.Likewise, the agency is proposing the same conditions for cod liver oilfor protectant use. Therefore, the Panel's recommended dosage for cod liveroil has been revised to be consistent with the dosage being proposed forshark liver oil, as discussed above. As discussed in comment 30 below, calamine and zinc oxide, which are limitedto concentrations of less than 50 percent, may be used only in combinationwith other protectants (not to exceed four) in order to assure that theprotectant content of the final formulation is at least 50 percent. <ITAG tagnum="74">References </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Transcript of the 29th Meeting of the Advisory Review Panel onOTC Hemorrhoidal Drug Products, January 22-24, 1978, p. 53. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Ibid., pp. 143-148. </ITAG>E. Comment on Counterirritants 21. One comment, submitted in response to the reopening of the anorectaladministrative record to include the Miscellaneous External Panel's statementon camphor-containing drug products (45 FR 63876), objected to that Panel'srecommendation that camphor be limited to 360 mg per package, preferablyin a child-proof container. The comment maintained that this would be aburdensome restriction for all OTC drug products containing low concentrationsof camphor and is not justified in view of these products' long historyof safe household use. Another comment stated that the risk exceeds thebenefit in many drug uses of camphor and that consumers should no longerbe exposed to these uses. These comments were also submitted to the rulemaking for external analgesicdrug products, and the agency adddressed the general issue of the safetyof camphor in the tentative final monograph on OTC external analgesic drugproducts. (See the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of February 8, 1983; 48 FR 5854-5855.) The HemorrhoidalPanel found camphor not safe and not effective for use in OTC anorectaldrug products (45 FR 35642) and placed it in Category II. The agency isretaining the Category II classification in this proposed rule. F. Comment on Astringents 22. One comment asked whether zinc sulfate can be assumed to be classifiedin the same category (astringent) as zinc oxide because both are zinc saltsand display similar properties. Zinc sulfate cannot be classified as an astringent at this time becauseno data have been submitted to show its safety and effectiveness for thisuse. G. Comment on Wound-Healing Agents 23. Several comments agreed with the Panel's minority report that supportsthe OTC use of live yeast cell derivative as a wound-healing agent. Thecomments stated that adequate data had been provided to the Panel to supportthe safety and effectiveness of live yeast cell derivative as a wound-healingagent. One comment added that a number of world-renowned wound-healingexperts from the United States and Europe met with the Panel in January1977 and concluded that evidence from the available studies of live yeastcell derivative as a wound-healing agent can be used to support the useof live yeast cell derivative in the anorectal area, and that live yeastcell derivative is an appropriate ingredient in an OTC anorectal drug product.Another comment argued that the claims placed in Category III by the Panel(45 FR 35657) for wound-healing agents are valid Category I claims whichshould be included in the tentative final monograph. Referring to the Panel'sCategory III labeling for wound-healing agents, one comment stated thatpersonal experiences in testing a product containing a Category III wound-healingagent had demonstrated that the product accelerated repair and that ``withinjury comes swelling, with repair, inevitably comes `shrinkage'.'' The agency concurs with the majority of the Panel that the submitted studieson rabbits and white rats, excised human tissue, human fibroblasts, experimentalabrasions to human skin, and paired skin grafts of burn wounds suggesta positive influence of live yeast cell derivative on wound healing andthat live yeast cell derivative has the characteristics of a wound-healingagent, i.e., increased oxygen uptake, hydroxyproline formation which isassociated with collagen biosynthesis, tissue growth, and epithelization.Regarding safety, the Panel noted that no studies of the safety of liveyeast cell derivative have been specifically carried out, although no toxicityhas been noted when the compound was used in experimental animals and noreports of clinical toxicity have been made or noted in the various clinicalstudies of the commercial product containing live yeast cell derivative(45 FR 35651). The Panel therefore assumed that the compound is safe forlimited use (1 week or less). Although the agency agrees with the Panel that live yeast cell derivativeis safe for use as a wound-healing agent for limited use (1 week or less),there remains a lack of sufficient data on its effectiveness. Data to supportthe effects of live yeast cell derivative on wound healing of the typeproposed for OTC use in human subjects are currently not included in thisrulemaking. Since the time the comment period closed following publicationof the advance notice of proposed rulemaking, new information, includingclinical studies, has been submitted to the rulemaking for OTC skin protectantdrug products and will be addressed in that rulemaking. These new dataare now under review. With publication of this proposed rule for OTC anorectaldrug products, the new information will also be included as part of theadministrative record in this rulemaking and will be addressed in the finalrule. Therefore, at this time, live yeast cell derivative remains in CategoryIII for effectiveness for use as an OTC wound-healing agent in the anorectalarea.The agency's detailed comments and evaluation of the data currently inthe administrative record are on file in the Dockets Management Branch(Ref. 1). Because the data are insufficient to reclassify wound healing ingredientsin Category I, the agency finds that there is insufficient basis at thistime to reclassify the labeling claims for these ingredients in CategoryI, as the comment argued. Should any Category III wound-healing ingredientsbe upgraded to Category I, the agency will upgrade the Category III claimsrecommended by the Panel or develop appropriate label claims based on thedata available at that time. <ITAG tagnum="74">Reference </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Letter from W.E. Gilbertson, FDA, to S.F. Barshay, Whitehall Laboratories,coded LET 010, Docket No. 80N-0050, Dockets Management Branch. </ITAG>H. Comment on Antiseptics. 24. One comment disagreed with the Panel's conclusion that antisepticsshould not be included in OTC anorectal drug products because no data hadbeen submitted showing that antiseptics in these products are more effectivethan soap and water. The comment asserted also that data had not been submittedshowing that antiseptics may be harmful when used in these products andpointed out that resorcinol and 8-hydroxyquinoline have both been usedsafely for many years as antiseptics in its OTC anorectal drug products.The comment maintained that anorectal drug products are often used whensoap and water for cleansing the anorectal area are not available and thatincluding antiseptics in these products may help prevent infection or itching.The Panel concluded that the inclusion of antiseptics in OTC anorectaldrug products ``is useful in concept,'' but ``that proof of any significantclinical benefit of claimed antiseptic ingredients must be demonstratedin clinical trials'' (45 FR 35659). The Panel believed that, because ofthe large numbers of microorganisms present in feces, there is little likelihoodthat effective antisepsis could be obtained in the anorectal area withantiseptics any more than with soap and water. The Panel was also concernedabout possible toxicity from the absorption of ingredients such as resorcinolthrough mucous membranes (45 FR 35661) and therefore classified resorcinolin Category III for external use and Category II for intrarectal use. Asdiscussed in comment 7 above, the ingredient 8-hydroxyquinoline was notsubmitted to the Panel for review. The comment did not submit any datato support the use of these ingredients in particular, or the use of antisepticsin general, in anorectal drug products. Therefore, the agency has no basisfor including these ingredients in the tentative final monograph.I. Comment on Hydrocortisone25. One comment pointed out that the Panel did not consider the statusof hydrocortisone for use in OTC anorectal drug products and requestedthat this use be clarified because another Panel's recommended labelingfor OTC external analgesic drug products containing hydrocortisone includeda claim ``for itchy genital and anal areas.'' (See 44 FR 69865.)Although the Hemorrhoidal Panel did not review and classify hydrocortisonefor use as an anorectal active ingredient, in the tentative final monographfor OTC external analgesic drug products (48 FR 5852) the agency proposedthe use of hydrocortisone and hydrocortisone acetate in concentrationsof 0.25 to 0.5 percent for various types of itching including ``anal itching.''The agency's proposed indication is similar to the various phrases regardingrelief of itching that the Hemorrhoidal Panel recommended as portions ofthe indications for OTC anorectal drug products. Because a claim for hydrocortisoneand hydrocortisone acetate for the temporary relief of anal itching isalready included in the OTC external analgesic tentative final monograph,the agency sees no reason to repeat that claim in this tentative finalmonograph. Further, the agency believes that, whenever possible, variousrelated conditions for which an ingredient is considered generally recognizedas safe and effective for OTC use should be listed in a single appropriatemonograph, which, in this case, is the monograph for OTC external analgesicdrug products.The agency does, however, note that the Hemorrhoidal Panel recommendedspecific warnings and directions for products labeled to relieve itchingin the anal area. These include specific warnings to consult a physicianpromptly in case of bleeding and to cleanse the anorectal area, when practical,before applying the product. The agency is adopting these warnings anddirections in this tentative final monograph. The agency believes thatany hydrocortisone-containing (or any other) drug product labeled for therelief of anal itching should bear appropriate warnings and directionsinformation. Therefore, in a future issue of the <T4>Federal Register</T4>, the agency will amend the tentative final monographfor OTC external analgesic drug products so that products containing ingredientssubject to that monograph that bear claims for the relief of ``anal itching''also bear the appropriate warnings and directions contained in andSection;346.50 (c)(2), (3), and (4) and (d)(1) of this tentative final monographfor anorectal drug products.J. Comment on Inactive Ingredients26. One comment stated that bismuth subgallate, classified by the Panelas a protectant when present in a product in at least 50 percent of a 2-gdosage unit, should also be classified as an inactive ingredient (or pharmaceuticalnecessity) when included in an anorectal drug product in small quantities.The comment stated that a marketed suppository contains a small quantityof bismuth subgallate as a stiffening agent and that no protectant labelingclaim is made for this product.Bismuth subgallate was classified by the Panel as a Category III protectantactive ingredient for external and intrarectal use in a concentration of17.5 to 166 mg per dosage unit, not to exceed 1 g per 24 hours (45 FR 35639).The Category III classification of bismuth subgallate would not precludeits use as a pharmaceutical necessity so long as the labeling of the productdoes not refer to bismuth subgallate as an active ingredient or associateit with any protectant activity. The agency concurs with the comment thatbismuth subgallate could be an inactive ingredient when used as a stiffeningagent in a suppository dosage form.K. Comments on Dosage27. One comment expressed concern that the Panel implied that a 2-g dosageunit is the size of choice for delivery to the anorectal area. The commentemphasized that, although studies may have shown that an average of 2 gof a product is used, a 2-g dosage unit should not be mandated as the standard.The Panel stated at 45 FR 35591 that ``a 2-gram dosage unit is reasonable,but this does not imply that other dosage sizes are not acceptable''. ThePanel also cited an official compendium as stating that the average adultsuppository weighs 2 g (Ref. 1) and added that in studies reviewed by thePanel, patients used an average of 2 g of ointment per application (Ref.2). The Panel recognized that exceptions to dosage unit size do occur,and its recommended monograph did not specify that dosage units be limitedto 2 g. The agency agrees with the Panel and is not proposing a standarddosage unit in this tentative final monogaph. <ITAG tagnum="74">References</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) ``The United States Pharmacopeia,'' 19th Revision, United StatesPharmacopeial Convention, Inc., Rockville, MD, p. 704, 1975. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) OTC Volume 120022. </ITAG>28. One comment contended that there is no basis in the Panel's report,or in any of the references cited, for limiting the dosage of petrolatumin andSection; 346.56(d)(11), which reads: ``* * * not to exceed six applicationsper 24 hours or after each bowel movement.'' Arguing that the proposeddosage limitation is misleading because petrolatum poses a very low riskto health from overuse, the comment requested that the dosage for petrolatumbe ``use as needed.''The agency agrees with the comment that there is no basis in the Panel'sreport, or on record, for limiting the dosage of petrolatum and that theingredient is safe when applied liberally as needed. Petrolatum is relativelyinert and is not absorbed through intact or broken skin or mucous membranes.Its safety has been established by decades of use as a base for anorectaland other medications and as a skin protectant. The agency believes thatthe directions for use for petrolatum in this tentative final monographshould be the same as those in the skin protectant tentative final monograph(published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of February 15, 1983; 48 FR 6820) and thereforeis proposing that andSection; 346.56(d)(6) of this tentative final monographread: ``Apply liberally as often as necessary.''29. One comment disagreed with the Panel's recommended dosage in andSection;346.14(k) of ``50 percent or greater per dosage unit'' to justify a protectantclaim for petrolatum. The comment stated that the Panel incorrectly interpretedthe studies cited on transepidermal water loss (45 FR 35627) and that protectioncan be obtained at a much lower film thickness than calculated by the Panel.The comment cited an oral presentation made to the Panel in which it wasexplained that only by specifying a dose could a concentration figure havemeaning (Ref. 1). The comment provided an example to show that protectioncan be obtained from as little as a 25-percent concentration in a dosageunit.The agency has reviewed the Panel's discussion of protectants (45 FR 35627),the Panel's discussion of petrolatum (45 FR 35634), and the presentationmade by Dr. M. Berdick (Ref. 1). The agency concludes that the Panel'srecommendation for a 50-percent or greater concentration of protectantsper 2 g dosage unit provides a reasonable basis for establishing the minimumquantity of a protectant that is necessary to provide relief. The Panelalso discussed the possibility that testing might establish that a protectantcould achieve the same effect at a lower concentration (45 FR 35628). However,the comment did not submit any clinical data to support a 25-percent concentration.Therefore, the agency proposes to adopt the Panel's recommendation of a50-percent or greater concentration for most anorectal protectants, includingpetrolatum. (See comments 20 above and 30 below.) <ITAG tagnum="74">Reference</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"> (1) Summary Minutes of the 27th Meeting of the Advisory Review Panelon OTC Hemorrhoidal Drug Products, April 29 and 30, 1977, OTC Volume 12APA2.</ITAG>30. Several comments noted that there appeared to be an inconsistency inthe Panel's recommended monograph between the concentration of protectantswhen used as single ingredients and when used in combination. The commentbelieved that the Panel intended ``that to justify a claim for protectanteffect a combination of two but not more than four protectants must bepresent for a combined concentration of at least 50 percent.'' The commentsrequested that recommended andSection;andSection; 346.14 and 346.22 be clarifiedand made consistent with the Panel's intent that the combined concentrationof protectants be at least 50 percent.The Panel concluded that to justify a claim for protectant effect, eitherof the following criteria must be met: (1) At least one protectant mustbe present to provide at least 50 percent by weight (1 g of a 2-g dosageunit); or (2) a combination of two but not more than four protectants mustbe present to provide at least 50 percent by weight (1 g of a 2-g dosageunit). (See 45 FR 35627.) The Panel believed that a minimum of 50 percentby weight (1 g of a 2-g dosage unit) would still permit the addition ofother active ingredients as well as any inactive ingredients that may benecessary to formulate a pharmaceutically acceptable preparation (45 FR35628).The Panel determined that for certain protectant ingredients limited toconcentrations of less than 50 percent the data submitted to the Panelindicated that these ingredients are usually present in combination withother protectant ingredients (45 FR 35592). Therefore, the agency concludesthat the intent of the Panel was that these ingredients, because of theirphysical characteristics, cannot be used as single ingredients but maybe used only in combination with other protectants in order to meet thePanel's recommended minimum protectant content per dosage unit, i.e., 50percent concentration by weight (1 g of a 2-g dosage unit). Accordingly,the agency is clarifying the Panel's recommendation and is proposing inandSection; 346.14(b) of this tentative final monograph that calamine, codliver oil, shark liver oil, and zinc oxide be used only in combinationwith other protectants.The Panel believed that limiting combinations of protectants to two butnot more than four protectants would provide reasonable latitude in theformulation of anorectal products because only four products submittedto the Panel had four or more protectant ingredients. However, becausethe Panel did not establish a concentration range for all protectant ingredients,the agency believes it is reasonable to propose that certain protectantingredients (aluminum hydroxide gel, cocoa butter, glycerin (20 to 45 percentaqueous solution), kaolin, lanolin, mineral oil, petrolatum, starch, andwhite petrolatum) be limited to a minimum concentration that contributesat least 12.5 percent by weight of the final dosage unit (0.25 g of a 2-gdosage unit). This will enable the formulation of combinations of up to4 protectants without permitting inactive levels of ingredients to be includedand will meet the Panel's recommended minimum combined protectant concentrationof 50 percent per dosage unit.Consistent with this determination, the agency is proposing that the minimumallowable amount of calamine or zinc oxide in a combination also be 12.5percent by weight. In addition, because the dosage for calamine is calculatedon its zinc oxide content and because both calamine and zinc oxide areclassified as Category I anorectal astringents as well as anorectal protectants,the agency concludes that the combined weight of zinc oxide in any anorectalcombination product should not exceed the maximum safe concentration ofzinc oxide recommended by the Panel, i.e., 25 percent by weight per dosageunit. Cod liver oil and shark liver oil should be present in a combinationdrug product in accord with the dosage discussed in comment 20 above.Accordingly, recommended andSection; 346.22 (redesignated as andSection; 346.22(a)in this tentative final monograph) is revised to read as follows: ``Anytwo, three, or four protectants identified in andSection; 346.14 may be combined,provided that the combined percentage by weight of all protectants in thecombination is at least 50 percent of the final product (1 gram of a 2-gramdosage unit). Any protectant ingredient included in the combination mustbe present at a level that contributes at least 12.5 percent by weight(0.25 gram of a 2-gram dosage unit). If an ingredient in andSection; 346.14(b)is included in the combination, it must not exceed the concentration limitspecified in andSection; 346.14(b).'' In addition, new andSection; 346.22(o)has been added to this tentative final monograph as follows: ``Any productcontaining calamine for use as a protectant and/or as an astringent and/orcontaining zinc oxide for use as a protectant and/or as an astringent maynot have a total weight of zinc oxide exceeding 25 percent by weight perdosage unit.''L. Comments on Combinations.31. Several comments objected to the Panel's recommended requirement thata combination of Category I anorectal active ingredients be shown safeand effective in final formulation testing. The comments particularly objectedto the Panel's recommendation that final formulation testing for effectivenessof a combination ``should demonstrate in clinical trials that there isa statistically significant difference in effectiveness of the combinationfor relief of a symptom as compared to the combination without each ofthe active ingredients, excluding protectants'' (45 FR 35594). The commentsargued that such testing of combinations is unprecedented and arbitraryand is neither called for in the agency's combination policy as set forthin andSection; 330.10(a)(4)(iv), nor consistent with the FDA general guidelinesfor OTC combination drug products (Ref. 1).The comments asserted that the combination policy for anorectal activeingredients could be made meaningful by deleting final formulation testingand basing decisions regarding safety and effectiveness of combinationson the evaluation of their active ingredients. The comments noted thatthe Panel placed in Category III a number of combinations of Category Iingredients from different therapeutic categories and that these combinationswould have been considered Category I were it not for the requirement offinal formulation testing. (See 45 FR 35593, part II. paragraphs K.10.a.(1), (2), and (3).) The comments requested that these combinations be placedin Category I.As discussed in comment 55 below, the agency is not requiring final formulationtesting of either single-ingredient or combination anorectal drug products.As a result, the agency is not requiring clinical trials to demonstratea statistically significant difference in effectiveness between the combinationin final formulation and the combination without each active ingredient.The regulations at andSection; 330.10(a)(4)(iv) state that an OTC drug maycombine two or more safe and effective active ingredients and may be generallyrecognized as safe and effective when each active ingredient makes a contributionto the claimed effect(s); when combining of the active ingredients doesnot decrease the safety or effectiveness of any of the individual activeingredients; and when the combination, when used under adequate directionsfor use and warnings against unsafe use, provides rational concurrent therapyfor a significant proportion of the target population. In addition, paragraph(1) of the agency's general guidelines (Ref. 1), which were not availableat the time of the Panel's deliberations, provides for the combinationof Category I active ingredients from different therapeutic categoriesto treat different symptoms concurrently if each ingredient is presentwithin its established safe and effective dosage range and the combinationmeets the OTC combination policy in andSection; 330.10(a)(4)(iv) in all otherrespects. Therefore, the agency is proposing that the combinations of CategoryI ingredients from up to three different therapeutic categories (exceptprotectants) that the Panel placed in Category III pending final formulationtesting be reclassified in Category I consistent with andSection; 330.10(a)(4)(iv)and the agency's supplementary guidelines for OTC combination drug products(Ref. 1). The combination of up to four protectants identified in andSection; 346.22of the Panel's recommended monograph is redesignated andSection; 346.22(a)in this tentative final monograph. As discussed above, the agency is proposingthat the following combinations be included in the designated paragraphsof andSection; 346.24 of this tentative final monograph: (b) Any single anorectal ingredient identified in andSection; 346.10, andSection;346.12, andSection; 346.16, andSection; 346.18, or andSection; 346.20 may becombined with up to four protectants in accordance with paragraph (a) ofthis section.(c) Any single local anesthetic identified in andSection; 346.10 may be combinedwith any single vasoconstrictor identified in andSection; 346.12. (d) Any single local anesthetic identified in andSection; 346.10 may be combinedwith any single astringent identified in andSection; 346.18.(e) Any single local anesthetic identified in andSection; 346.10 may be combinedwith any single keratolytic identified in andSection; 346.20.(f) Any single vasoconstrictor identified in andSection; 346.12 may be combinedwith any single astringent identified in andSection; 346.18. (g) Any single analgesic, anesthetic, and antipruritic identified in andSection;346.16 may be combined with any single astringent identified in andSection;346.18. (h) Any single analgesic, anesthetic, and antipruritic identified in andSection;346.16 may be combined with any single keratolytic identified in andSection;346.20. (i) Any single astringent identified in andSection; 346.18 may be combinedwith any single keratolytic identified in andSection; 346.20. (j) Any single local anesthetic identified in andSection; 346.10 may be combinedwith any single vasoconstrictor identified in andSection; 346.12 and withany single astringent identified in andSection; 346.18. (k) Any single local anesthetic identified in andSection; 346.10 may be combinedwith any single astringent identified in andSection; 346.18 and with anysingle keratolytic identified in andSection; 346.20. (l) Any single vasoconstrictor identified in andSection; 346.12 may be combinedwith any single analgesic, anesthetic, and antipruritic identified in andSection;346.16 and with any single astringent identified in andSection; 346.18. (m) Any single analgesic, anesthetic, and antipruritic identified in andSection;346.16 may be combined with any single astringent identified in andSection;346.18 and with any single keratolytic identified in andSection; 346.20.(n) Any combination of ingredients listed in paragraphs (c) through (m)of this section may be combined with up to four protectants in accordancewith paragraph (a) of this section. The redesignation of the term ``counterirritant'' to ``analgesic, anesthetic,and antipruritic'' is discussed in Part II.B.6 below_<T3>Summary of the Agency's Changes in the Panel's Recommendations.</T3>The Panel's classification of combinations of more than three CategoryI ingredients from different pharmacologic groups, except protectants,is discussed in comment 32 below. <ITAG tagnum="74">Reference </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Food and Drug Administration, ``General Guidelines for OTC DrugCombination Products,'' September 1978, Docket No. 78D-0322, Dockets ManagementBranch.</ITAG>32. Two comments objected to the Panel's recommendation to limit the numberof ingredients included in hemorrhoidal preparations. The comments statedthat limiting ingredients to only three pharmacological groups is unscientific,uncorroborated, and arbitrary. One comment maintained that limiting hemorrhoidalpreparations to four or fewer nonprotectant active ingredients would tendto make them ``fungible'' and would discourage ingenuity in the developmentof combination products. The comment argued that these recommendationscontradict FDA guidelines for combination drug products in andSection; 330.10(a)(4)(iv).The comments recommended that a fixed limit not be arbitrarily placed uponthe number of active ingredients in a combination of hemorrhoidal ingredientswhen there is evidence that the combination is rational, safe, and effectivewith a suitable target population. One comment stated, as an example, thata product containing a vasoconstrictor to shrink hemorrhoids, a local anestheticto deaden pain, a protectant to soothe the irritated area, a counterirritantto cool the irritated area until the local anesthetic can take effect,and an antiseptic to help prevent infection and help relieve itching wouldbe beneficial to many hemorrhoid sufferers. The agency agrees with the comments that a fixed limit need not be placedupon the number of active ingredients in a combination product if it canbe shown to be a rational, safe, and effective combination with a suitabletarget population. This position is consistent with FDA policy for OTCcombination drug products in andSection; 330.10(a)(4)(iv) and with the guidelinesfor combinations (Ref. 1). However, the agency believes that the interestof consumers is best served if the desired therapeutic effect is achievedsafely and effectively by the smallest number of active ingredients.The Panel placed certain two-ingredient and three-ingredient combinationproducts in Category III pending final formulation testing (45 FR 35593).Because the agency is not adopting the Panel's requirements for final formulationtesting, the agency is proposing that these combinations be Category Iin this tentative final monograph. (See comment 31 above.) The agency willconsider any other combinations for Category I, regardless of the numberof ingredients and the formulation, provided adequate data are presentedin accordance with the combination policy and the guidelines mentionedabove. The specific combination of five ingredients cited by one commenthas not been included in this tentative final monograph because the commentsubmitted no data for the agency to evaluate.<ITAG tagnum="74">Reference</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Food and Drug Administration, ``General Guidelines for OTC DrugCombination Products,'' September 1978, Docket No. 78D-0322, Dockets ManagementBranch.</ITAG>33. One comment suggested revising the Panel's language in Part II. paragraphK.8.d._Criteria for Category I combination products for external and/orintrarectal use, which reads as follows: ``Products that do not claim protectantactivity and contain one Category I active ingredient from each pharmacologicgroup in the combinations identified below are classified as Category Icombination products, provided that (1) the active ingredients and theirlabeling are generally recognized as safe and effective, (2) such ingredientsare present in amounts within the effective dosage range, and (3) the finalformulation has been shown to be safe and effective.''The comment suggested revising the first part of this paragraph to read``Combinations of Category I active ingredients each from a different pharmacologicgroup identified below, combined with or without one or more protectants,are classified as Category I combination products * * * *'' In addition,the comment recommended that paragraph K.10.a.(1), which reads ``Combinationscontaining any single Category I active ingredient and one or more protectants,''be moved to paragraph K.8.d., and a new paragraph K.8.e. be added to readas follows: ``Any single Category I active ingredient and one or more protectants.''The combinations referred to in paragraphs K.8.d. and K.10.a. of the Panel'sreport are the same combinations of Category I ingredients from differenttherapeutic categories that the agency is proposing as Category I in andSection;346.22 (b) through (n) of this tentative final monograph. Therefore, thecomment's suggested revisions of the Panel's report are not necessary.(See comment 31 above.)34. One comment objected to the Panel's conclusion that the combinationof a local anesthetic and a counterirritant in a hemorrhoidal drug productis irrational (45 FR 35593). The comment argued that, although the Panelacknowledged that the onset of action of the local anesthetic may be brieflypreceded by the action of the counterirritant, it ignored the importanceof ``fast, cooling relief, even if superseded by another ingredient's soothingeffect later.'' The comment stated that a counterirritant and a local anestheticshould be combined in a hemorrhoidal product if the inclusion of both ingredientsresults in any extra relief and satisfaction for the user. The commentstated that it was not aware of any adverse reactions to menthol when usedas a counterirritant in the strength used in its rectal ointments. The Panel concluded that the simultaneous use of a counterirritant (suchas menthol) and a local anesthetic is irrational. The mechanism of actionof a counterirritant is dependent upon an intact nerve function, but nervefunction is specifically blocked by an effective local anesthetic. Theaction of a counterirritant that may briefly precede the action of a localanesthetic is not sufficient justification for the combination.The agency concurs with the Panel and notes that the Topical AnalgesicPanel in its report on external analgesic drug products also classifiedthe combination of a local anesthetic and a counterirritant in CategoryII. The Topical Analgesic Panel concluded that it is irrational to combinepharmacologic groups that act in opposition to each other and that sucha combination may be unsafe (44 FR 69790). No comments objecting to thatPanel's conclusions were submitted during the comment period followingthe publication of the Panel's report. In the tentative final monographon OTC external analgesic drug products (48 FR 5852), the agency reaffirmedthat Panel's Category II classification for this combination. The Hemorrhoidal Panel concluded that menthol is safe and effective forexternal use as a counterirritant (45 FR 35641). The Panel also concludedthat menthol is safe but not effective for intrarectal use (45 FR 35643);the agency concurs.The deciding factor for the Category II classification of the combinationof a local anesthetic and a counterirritant was not the safety of mentholas a counterirritant, but rather the lack of medical rationale for combiningthese two pharmacologic groups. 35. One comment recommended that the tentative final monograph for anorectaldrug products include the combination of live yeast cell derivative andprotectants, including shark liver oil.The Panel classified live yeast cell derivative in Category III as a wound-healingagent in anorectal drug products and recommended that if a Category IIIingredient is present in a combination product containing no Category IIingredient, the combination is classified as Category III (45 FR 35593and 35594). On the basis of the Panel's combination policy, the combinationof live yeast cell derivative and any Category I protectant, such as sharkliver oil, is a Category III combination. The Panel's recommendation isconsistent with the agency's policy for combination drug products in andSection;330.10(a)(4)(iv) and the combination guidelines (Ref. 1). Live yeast cellderivative remains in Category III in this tentative final monograph; thereforethe agency considers the combination of live yeast cell derivative andany Category I protectant to be a Category III combination product at thistime. (See comment 23 above.)<ITAG tagnum="74">Reference </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Food and Drug Administration, ``General Guidelines for OTC DrugCombination Products,'' September 1978, Docket No. 78D-0322, Dockets ManagementBranch. </ITAG>M. Comments on Labeling of Anorectal Drug Products 36. Two comments stated that existing statutory provisions (15 U.S.C. 1453(a),21 CFR 201.61, and sections 508 and 502(e) of the Federal Food, Drug, andCosmetic Act) do not show a congressional intent to authorize FDA to legislatethe exact wording of OTC drug claims to the exclusion of other equallyaccurate and truthful claims for these products, and that section 502(c)of the act demonstrates a congressional intent to the contrary. The commentsmaintained that there are truthful phrases, other than those recommendedby the Panel, that would be in keeping with the conclusions of the Panel.In the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of May 1, 1986 (51 FR 16258), the agency publisheda final rule changing its labeling policy for stating the indications foruse of OTC drug products. Under 21 CFR 330.1(c)(2), the label and labelingof OTC drug products are required to contain in a prominent and conspicuouslocation, either (1) the specific wording on indications for use establishedunder an OTC drug monograph, which may appear within a boxed area designated``APPROVED USES''; (2) other wording describing such indications for usethat meets the statutory prohibitions against false or misleading labeling,which shall neither appear within a boxed area nor be designated ``APPROVEDUSES''; or (3) the approved monograph language on indications, which mayappear within a boxed area designated ``APPROVED USES,'' plus alternativelanguage describing indications for use that is not false or misleading,which shall appear elsewhere in the labeling. All other OTC drug labelingrequired by a monograph or other regulation (e.g., statement of identity,warnings, and directions) must appear in the specific wording establishedunder the OTC drug monograph or other regulation where exact language hasbeen established and identified by quotation marks, e.g., 21 CFR 201.63or 330.1(g). The proposed rule in this document is subject to the labelingprovisions in andSection; 330.1(c)(2). 37. Several comments objected to the Panel's recommendation that all inactiveingredients be listed in the labeling of OTC anorectal drug products. Thecomments argued that a list of inactive ingredients in the labeling wouldbe meaningless, confusing, and misleading to most consumers. The commentsnoted that the act does not require that inactive ingredients of drug productsbe included in labeling and argued that listing these ingredients wouldobscure information that is more meaningful to consumers. Two of the comments also cited the warning recommended by the Panel inandSection; 346.50(c)(5) for anorectal drug products containing perfume asan example of labeling related to inactive ingredients that should notbe required. This warning states, ``If redness, burning, itching, swelling,pain, or other symptoms develop or increase, discontinue use and consulta physician.'' One comment stated that the warning would be confusing toconsumers because the symptoms identified in the warning are the same asthose that the product is intended to treat and that such symptoms obviouslywill already be present. Two of the comments pointed out that neither cosmeticproducts nor soaps are required to contain a warning statement to indicatetheir perfume content.The agency agrees that the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act does notrequire the identification of all inactive ingredients in the labelingof OTC drug products. Section 502(e) (21 U.S.C. 352(e)) does require disclosureof active ingredients and of certain ingredients, whether included as activeor inactive components in a product. Although the act does not requirethe disclosure of all inactive ingredients in the labeling of OTC drugproducts, the agency agrees with the Panel that listing of inactive ingredientsin OTC drug product labeling would be useful information for some consumers.Consumers with known allergies or intolerances to certain ingredients wouldthen be able to identify substances that they may wish to avoid. The Proprietary Association, the trade association that represents approximately85 OTC drug manufacturers who reportedly market between 90 and 95 percentof volume of all OTC drug products sold in the United States, has establishedguidelines (Ref. 1) for its member companies to list voluntarily inactiveingredients in the labeling of OTC drug products. Under another voluntaryprogram begun in 1974, the member companies of The Proprietary Associationhave been including the quantities of active ingredients on OTC drug labels.The agency is not at this time proposing to require the listing of inactiveingredients in OTC drug product labeling. However, the agency commendsthese voluntary efforts and urges all other OTC drug manufacturers to similarlylabel their products. If a safety problem has been demonstrated for an inactive ingredient, theagency will take appropriate action. (See 21 CFR 201.20.) Because perfumesare considered to be inactive ingredients and because the Panel did notestablish that a safety problem exists for specific perfumes, the agencyis not proposing the Panel's recommended warning in this tentative finalmonograph. <ITAG tagnum="74">Reference </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) ``Guidelines for Disclosure of Inactive Ingredients in OTC Medicines,''The Proprietary Association, Washington, DC, July 12, 1984, copy includedin OTC Volume 12ATFM.</ITAG>38. Four comments objected to the Panel's recommendation that the term``anorectal'' be used in the statement of identity (andSection; 346.50(a))and urged the agency to use instead the more familiar term ``hemorrhoidal.''To support this position, two comments submitted the results of a surveyof 144 consumers aged 18 and older to determine what percentage of consumersunderstand the word ``anorectal.'' According to one comment, the surveyresults indicated that 70 percent of the consumers did not understand theterm ``anorectal.'' The comments further argued that using the term ``hemorrhoidal''would eliminate confusion and aid consumers in purchasing a product tohelp treat specific symptomology. One comment stated that the term ``hemorrhoid''has come to mean more than clinically defined hemorrhoids and that consumersunderstand this term as encompassing various kinds of anorectal discomfortsand disorders. Another comment disliked the popular use of the terms ``piles''and ``hemorrhoids'' and commended the Panel for educating the public byproperly defining terms used to describe anorectal disorders. The agency could not evaluate the merits of the survey because only theresults were submitted, and no details were included. However, the agencyagrees with the comments in principle that the term ``hemorrhoidal'' ismore familiar and understandable to consumers than the term ``anorectal.''The agency further believes it is important to educate the consumer asto the proper use of these products. The Panel recommended that anorectalproducts be labeled for the relief of symptoms associated with hemorrhoids,piles, and other anorectal disorders and stated that consumers must beable to understand the information presented in labeling in order to usethese products safely and effectively. Therefore, the agency is proposingthat the term ``hemorrhoidal'' may appear alone or in parentheses nextto the term ``anorectal'' in the statement of identity for all OTC anorectaldrug products in andSection; 346.50(a). In addition, the dosage form, e.g.,cream, lotion, or ointment, may be included in the statement of identity.39. One comment pointed out that several statements of identity could berequired for petrolatum because the review of this multipurpose ingredientby several OTC advisory review panels has resulted in multiple labelingrequirements. The comment noted that statements of identity of ``skin protectant''and ``anorectal agent'' or ``anorectal product'' have already been recommendedand that additional statements of identity are yet to come in other monographs.The comment recognized the need for a statement of identity in the labelingof every OTC drug product, but argued that the agency should allow a singlestatement of identity for a multipurpose ingredient such as petrolatum.The comment contended that a statement such as ``topical protectant andlubricant'' would adequately cover every OTC drug use of petrolatum andwould also satisfy the requirements of andSection; 201.61(b) (21 CFR 201.61(b)).Petrolatum has been placed in Category I by advisory review panels forthe following OTC uses: Ophthalmic emollient, anorectal agent, and skinprotectant. Ophthalmic drug products containing petrolatum are sterileto avoid the risk of contamination and usually are marketed with indicationsfor ophthalmic use only, but other OTC drug products containing petrolatumcould be labeled for both anorectal and skin protectant use. The comment'srecommended statement of identity, ``topical protectant and lubricant,''does not make clear that such a product could be used anorectally and thereforedoes not fully  satisfy the requirements of andSection; 201.61(b). Concerningthe comment's suggestion to use ``lubricant'' in a statement of identityfor petrolatum, the agency stated in the tentative final monograph forOTC skin protectant drug products that the term ``lubrication'' is a cosmeticclaim. (See the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of February 15, 1983; 48 FR 6828.) Likewise,the agency believes that ``lubricant'' is inappropriate in a statementof identity for OTC anorectal drug products.To make it clear to consumers that the product could be used both as ananorectal agent and as a skin protectant, its labeling should contain thestatement of identity, indications, warnings, and directions for use fromboth rulemakings. As an alternative, manufacturers may choose to labelthe product for only one of its intended uses. In this tentative final monograph, the agency is proposing that the statementof identity for petrolatum be ``anorectal (hemorrhoidal),'' ``hemorrhoidal,''``anorectal (hemorrhoidal) (insert dosage form, e. g., cream, lotion, orointment),'' or ``hemorrhoidal (insert dosage form, e.g., cream, lotion,or ointment).'' (See comment 38 above.) A combined statement of identityrecognizing the uses established in both monographs, e.g., ``anorectal(hemorrhoidal)/skin protectant,'' would not be burdensome and would meetthe requirements of andSection; 201.61(b). 40. One comment suggested that, to eliminate duplication of words or phrases,andSection; 346.50(b) be revised to permit combining the many indicationsrecommended by the Panel, provided that the  combined statement is clearand understandable with no change in meaning or emphasis.The agency agrees with the comment and, consistent with the format andstyle used in other recently published tentative final monographs, proposesto revise the general indication for all anorectal drug products in andSection;346.50(b) as follows: (``For the temporary relief of,'' ``Gives temporaryrelief of,'' or ``Helps relieve the'') (as an option, select neither, one,or both of the following: ``local'' or ``anorectal'') [select one or moreof the following: ``discomfort,'' ``itching,'' or ``itching and discomfort,''followed by: ``associated with'' (select one or more of the following:``hemorrhoids,'' ``anorectal disorders,'' ``inflamed hemorrhoidal tissues,''``hemorrhoidal tissues,'' ``anorectal inflammation,'' or ``piles (hemorrhoids).'')](See part II. paragraph B.9. below.)In addition the agency has also revised the indications statements recommendedby the Panel for specific therapeutic groups for clarity and to eliminateduplicative words and phases as appropriate.41. One comment questioned why the Panel did not include the claim ``shrinkshemorrhoids'' for anorectal drug products containing zinc oxide and otherastringents. The comment cited the following statement from a medical reference(Ref. 1): ``This `astringent' (drawing together) action is characterizedby visible contraction of the tissue, blanching and wrinkling of  mucousmembranes * * *. The principal astringents are: metallic salts * * *.''The comment stated that zinc salts, particularly zinc oxide, are consideredtypical and effective astringents, and requested that the labeling claim``shrinks hemorrhoids'' be allowed for anorectal preparations containingsuch astringents.The Panel did not specifically address the claim ``shrinks hemorrhoids''in relation to anorectal astringents. However, in its general discussionof astringents, the Panel concluded that an effect of astringents is a``decrease in cell volume (implying a reduction in swelling),'' but thatthis effect is not sufficient to warrant a labeling claim for the reductionof swelling (45 FR 35645 and 35649).In its discussion of Category II labeling for vasoconstrictors, the Panelstated that the applicability of claims such as ``shrinks hemorrhoids''for certain combinations of ingredients rested primarily on a definitionof the word ``shrink'' (45 FR 35626). Although the Panel generally agreedthat the word ``shrink'' refers to a reduction in size, there were differingopinions on whether this signifies a temporary phenomenon or implies apermanent change. The Panel stated that consumers would probably considerthat a permanent change is to be expected. However, data submitted to thePanel indicated that vasoconstrictors produce a temporary reduction inswelling, and rebound swelling may occur in the long run. Thus, the Panel found that an anorectal vasoconstrictor can ``temporarily reduce swelling''or ``temporarily shrinks'' and that these words sufficiently conveyed theusefulness of vasoconstrictors in the short-term treatment of anorectalsymptoms (45 FR 35626). The agency concurs. (See the indications for vasoconstrictorsin andSection; 346.50(b)(2)(ii) of the tentative final monograph.) The comment did not submit any data to show that astringents effectivelyshrink hemorrhoids even temporarily. Therefore, the agency has no basisfor including the requested claim for anorectal astringents in this tentativefinal monograph. <ITAG tagnum="74">Reference </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Sollman, T., ``Local Irritants, Corrosives and Astringents,''in ``A Manual of Pharmacology,'' W.B. Saunders Co., Philadelphia, p. 139,1957.</ITAG>42. Three comments objected to the Panel's recommendation in andSection;346.50(c) that warning statements be placed in a ``box border'' and printedin black ink or the most prominent color of the label. The comments arguedthat a ``box border'' is not only inappropriate but also counterproductivebecause indiscriminately highlighting multiple minor warnings, such asthose recommended by the Panel, would increase the probability that serioushazards will be ignored in other situations. Two of the comments arguedthat there are no warnings regarding the  use of anorectal preparationsthat justify a ``box border'' requirement. The comments stated that FDAspecifies only two uses for ``box borders'': To convey important informationto physicians regarding indications for drugs found to be less than effectivein the Drug Efficacy Study (21 CFR 201.200), and to warn against seriousor even life-threatening toxic effects of prescription drugs (21 CFR 201.316).The agency agrees with the comments that a ``box border'' should be reservedfor special information that should be highlighted to prevent potentialserious hazards. This requirement is not justified for any of the OTC anorectaldrug product warnings, and in fact there have been only two instances sofar in the OTC drug review in which the agency believed a ``box border''was justified. The first instance was in the tentative final monographfor OTC emetic drug products, published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of September 5, 1978 (43 FR 39544), in whichthe agency proposed that the warning ``Call a physician, Poison ControlCenter, or emergency room for advice before using, and call immediatelyif vomiting does not occur within 20 minutes after a second dose has beengiven'' be printed in red and conspicuously boxed. The second instancewas in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of May 1, 1986 (51 FR 16258) in which the agencypublished a final rule that amended the exclusivity policy and establishednew labeling requirements for OTC drug products. The final rule providesmanufacturers  three alternatives for the labeling of OTC drug products.One of those alternatives provides that the label and labeling containin a prominent and conspicuous location indications for use that have beenestablished under a final OTC drug monograph. At the option of the manufacturer,this labeling may be designated ``APPROVED USES,'' or be given a similarpermitted designation, each time it appears in the labeling. If the ``APPROVEDUSES'' or a similar designation is used, the labeling involved shall appearwithin a boxed area. Other applicable labeling, e.g., warnings and directions,may be included in the boxed area, in which case the boxed area shall bedesignated ``APPROVED INFORMATION'' rather than ``APPROVED USES.'' As the comment noted, the Panel also recommended that warnings on anorectaldrug products be printed in a special type, size, or color or be illustratedto aid consumers. The agency does not believe that these recommendationsare necessary to ensure proper labeling of these products and is not includingthem in this tentative final monograph. 43. Two comments requested deletion of the pregnancy warning recommendedby the Panel in andSection; 346.50(c)(7)(i) for all intrarectal productsexcept protectants. The warning states, ``The safety of this product hasnot been established for use by pregnant women or by nursing mothers.''The comments stated that the Panel had no evidence to show any risk topregnant or  nursing women from the use of intrarectal products. One commentcontended that the Panel was ``merely expressing its belief that it isa good policy for pregnant or nursing women to take no more drugs thanare essential.'' The comment stated that warnings based on a speculativehypothesis would only serve to dilute the importance of other warningsand that if the Panel's warning were heeded, pregnant women would be deprivedof the use of products that could relieve some of the major discomfortsof pregnancy. A final rule requiring a warning concerning the use of OTC drugs by pregnantor nursing women was published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of December 3, 1982 (47 FR 54750). This warning(21 CFR 201.63) is specific to OTC drugs that are intended for systemicabsorption and therefore is not required for OTC anorectal drug productsthat are intended for local effect. 44. Three comments objected to the Panel's recommended 7-day use limitationin andSection; 346.50(c)(1), ``If symptoms do not improve, do not use thisproduct for more than 7 days and consult a physician.'' Two of the commentscontended that this limitation is arbitrary and unsupported by documentation.The third comment contended that minor anorectal conditions normally areamenable to a 2-week treatment period before a doctor should be consulted.The purpose of a limitation-of-use statement on a product is to informthe consumer of the period of time that is reasonable to allow for symptomsto begin to show improvement  or to clear. The Panel concluded that symptomsof minor anorectal disorders that can be self-treated should be significantlyrelieved, if not completely cleared, in 7 days. The Panel was concernedthat the continued self-treatment of the symptoms associated with hemorrhoidsand other anorectal conditions may mask more serious medical problems,such as anal fissures, fistulae, abscesses, anal warts, or fecal impactions.The Panel believed that if symptoms do not respond to self-treatment in7 days, the condition could be a serious one, requiring professional diagnosisand treatment. The comments did not submit any data to show that more than 7 days maybe required to obtain benefits from OTC anorectal drug products. Therefore,the agency proposes that the 7-day limitation be retained, but is revisingthis warning to advise consumers that a doctor should also be consultedif the condition worsens. The revised warning is proposed as follows: ``Ifcondition worsens or does not improve within 7 days, consult a doctor.''45. Two comments suggested revising the Panel's recommended warning statementin andSection; 346.50(c)(7)(ii) that is specific to intrarectal productsto be used with special applicators, such as pile pipes or other mechanicaldevices. The warning states, ``Do not use this product if the introductioninto the rectum causes additional pain. Consult a physician promptly.''One of the comments contended that less  trauma would result by applyingthe product intrarectally with the fingers and suggested that the warningstate, ``If use of (device) is painful, apply with fingers.'' The othercomment noted that no comparable warning was proposed for suppositories,which usually cause some initial discomfort upon insertion, and suggestedthat the warning be deleted or altered to reflect common use conditionsfor products used with applicators. The Panel stated that special applicators, such as pile pipes, are usedto allow the introduction of a preparation above the anal sphincter sothat it may remain in contact with the rectal mucosa where attempted insertionof an ointment by the finger is not apt to be successful (45 FR 35589).However, the Panel was concerned that there is some danger that the rectalmucosa can be perforated if a special applicator, such as a pile pipe,is not inserted into the rectum correctly. Accordingly, the Panel believedthat the warning it recommended was necessary to alert consumers that thereshould not be any additional pain (caused by further injury) with the useof a pile pipe. The warning was not intended, as suggested by the comment,to alert consumers about any discomfort that may occur from the insertionof a pile pipe or a suppository. The agency agrees with the Panel thatthe warning is beneficial but is revising it for clarity as follows: ``Donot use this product with an applicator if the introduction of the applicatorinto the rectum causes additional pain. Consult a doctor promptly.''46. One comment stated that the Panel did not adequately define the terms``internal'' and ``external'' for the purpose of describing ``locus andnecessary sites of treatment of anal/rectal irritation.'' The comment contendedthat many of the Panel's statements ``imply that the entire anal canalis a portion of the anal/rectal `interior,' '' but that this ``interior''area is not a proper location for application of certain hemorrhoidal ingredients.The comment objected to the Panel's recommended warnings in andSection; 346.52(c)(2)for hemorrhoidal products containing local anesthetics for external useonly, ``<T3>Caution: </T3>This product is for external use only. Do not apply insidethe rectum in any way,'' and in andSection; 346.50(c)(6) for products forexternal use only, ``Do not put this product into the rectum by using fingersor any mechanical device or applicator.''The comment argued that these warnings can be construed by the generalpublic as prohibiting insertion of certain hemorrhoidal drug preparationsinto the anal canal, but that this apparently was not the Panel's intendedmeaning. The comment added that if these warnings go uncorrected, misinterpretationby the general public ``will result in a great deal of unalleviated consumer`hemorrhoidal' discomfort.'' The comment stated that pain stemming fromirritation in the anal canal below the mucocutaneous junction can be effectivelytreated only by ``internal'' application (insertion through the anal canaland into the rectum) of a hemorrhoidal drug preparation. The comment describedcertain suppositories and ointments that liquefy when inserted and thenwork their way down, through, and over the cutaneous area below the mucocutaneousjunction. The comment contended that the Panel's conclusions concerningthe use of an anesthetic in a hemorrhoidal drug product do not make allowancefor the internal use of suppositories and ointments for the treatment ofskin in the anal canal below the mucocutaneous junction. The comment urgedthat the Panel's definitions of ``external'' and ``internal'' and its recommendedlabeling be clarified to promote correct consumer use of these products.The Panel used the term ``external,'' but not the word ``internal,'' preferring``intrarectal'' instead. The Panel consistently referred to the skin ofthe perianal area and the skin of the anal canal up to the mucocutaneousjunction as external, and to the mucous membranes above the mucocutaneousjunction, i.e., in the rectum, as intrarectal. It is apparent that, inthe Panel's view, the point of distinction between ``external'' and ``internal''use was the mucocutaneous junction. The agency believes that the Panel'sdefinition of external use and intrarectal use are appropriate. Therefore,the agency is proposing those definitions in this tentative final monograph.The comment is correct in stating that the Panel did not recommend labelingfor the intrarectal application of suppositories and ointments containinga local anesthetic to relieve pain stemming from irritation outside therectum (i.e., in the anal canal below the mucocutaneous junction and perianalarea). Although the comment contends that such an intrarectal applicationwould be effective because of liquefaction of the product and subsequentseepage through the anal canal, the Panel considered seepage only withinthe context of an incontinent anal sphincter and not within the contextthat an incontinent anal sphincter would provide a means to relieve externalsymptoms on the skin of the perianal area and the anal canal. Rather, thePanel considered intrarectal application only for local effect inside therectum. The comment provided no data to alter the Panel's recommendations,and the agency believes that the intrarectal application of a suppositoryor ointment is not an appropriate means to alleviate external symptomsthrough liquefaction and seepage. Further, the agency disagrees with thecomment's argument that the Panel's recommended warnings will result ina great deal of unalleviated consumer ``hemorrhoidal discomfort.'' Mostof the ingredients included in the tentative final monograph, but not localanesthetics, may be used intrarectally to alleviate discomfort. The Panel'srecommended warnings would only apply to the small number of OTC anorectaldrug products to be used externally only. Accordingly, the general warningfor any anorectal ingredient intended for external use, as recommendedby the Panel in andSection; 346.50(c)(6), is being included in this tentativefinal monograph, but has been redesignated as andSection; 346.50(c)(4). However,the warning recommended by the Panel in andSection; 346.52(c)(2) for productscontaining local anesthetics for external use is not being proposed inthis tentative final monograph because it is repetitive of the warningproposed andSection; 346.50(c)(4).47. One comment disagreed with the warning recommended by the Panel inandSection; 346.54(c), ``Do not use this product if you have heart disease,high blood pressure, hyperthyroidism, diabetes, difficulty in urination,or are taking tranquilizers or nerve pills.'' The comment stated that thiswarning would virtually eliminate the use of OTC anorectal drug productscontaining vasoconstrictor active ingredients by a large number of personsover 35 years of age who self-treat hemorrhoidal disorders. The commentrecommended substituting a cautionary statement in place of the phrase``do not use.''The agency has reviewed the Panel's general discussion of vasoconstrictors(45 FR 35620) and the warning recommended in andSection; 346.54(c) and hascompared this warning with the warnings proposed for vasoconstrictor activeingredients in the final monograph for OTC bronchodilator drug products,published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of October 2, 1986 (51 FR 35326), and in thetentative final monograph for OTC nasal decongestant drug products, publishedin the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of January 15, 1985 (50 FR 2220). The Panel statedthat a concomitant effect occurs on receptors in the heart and lungs whenvasoconstrictors are applied to receptors in the anorectal area (45 FR35620). Because of these potentially serious side effects and because usefuleffects are achieved with minimum quantities of vasoconstrictors, the Panelrecommended that the safe OTC anorectal dosages of vasoconstrictors beequivalent to safe intravenous dosages. The Panel stated that when vasoconstrictorsare used in these doses for local effect, undesirable systemic effectscan be avoided (45 FR 35621).However, the Panel recommended the warning in andSection; 346.54(c) to alertconsumers to undesirable side effects that can occur if systemic absorptionoccurs from either external or intrarectal application. These side effectscan include elevated blood pressure, cardiac arrhythmia or irregular heartrate, central nervous system disturbance or nervousness, tremor, sleeplessness,and aggravation of symptoms of hyperthyroidism. Prolonged use of excessivedosage can also lead to anxiety or paranoia (45 FR 35621).The agency concludes that vasoconstrictors used in the anorectal area,if absorbed, could cause the same undesirable systemic effects as vasoconstrictorsused as bronchodilators and nasal decongestants, but that significant absorptionis unlikely to occur when vasoconstrictors are used externally on intactskin for a short time. However, because the skin of the anorectal areais usually abraded, and swollen hemorrhoids may be present, there is anincreased potential for systemic absorption of vasoconstrictors used externally.Therefore, the agency agrees with the Panel that a warning for anorectalvasoconstrictors is appropriate for both external and intrarectal use;however, the agency is proposing an expanded warning in this tentativefinal monograph to be consistent with the warnings required for these drugswhen used as bronchodilators and nasal decongestants. The revised warningreads as follows for externally applied anorectal vasoconstrictors: ``Donot use this product if you have heart disease, high blood pressure, thyroiddisease, diabetes, or difficulty in urination due to enlargement of theprostate gland unless directed by a doctor.'' In addition, the phrase ``** * or are taking tranquilizers or nerve pills'' recommended by the Panelin andSection; 346.54(c) is changed to the following standard drug interactionprecaution that appears in the bronchodilator final monograph for drugproducts containing ephedrine and epinephrine and in the nasal decongestanttentative final monograph for drug products containing phenylephrine hydrochloridefor oral use: ``Do not use this product if you are presently taking a prescriptiondrug for high blood pressure or depression, without first consulting yourdoctor.''Because of the seriousness of the side effects that may occur if vasoconstrictorsare systemically absorbed, cautionary language, as suggested by the comment,would not be adequate to alert consumers. However, the agency has addedto the warnings the qualifying phrases ``unless directed by a doctor,''``consult your doctor,'' and ``without first consulting your doctor'' tomake it clear that consumers to whom the warnings are directed may notneed to completely forgo the use of these products, but may be able touse them under the advice or supervision of a doctor. Based on the bronchodilatorfinal monograph, the agency is proposing the following additional warningfor anorectal drug products containing ephedrine: ``Some users of thisproduct may experience nervousness, tremor, sleeplessness, nausea, andloss of appetite. If these symptoms persist or become worse, consult yourdoctor.''48. One comment stated that the warnings recommended for all anorectaldrug products in andSection; 346.50(c) (1), (2), and (3) should not applyto petrolatum. Concerning the warning in andSection; 346.50(c)(1), ``If symptomsdo not improve, do not use this product for more than seven days and consulta physician,'' the comment argued that the use of this ingredient for morethan 7 days would not be hazardous per se because petrolatum is remarkablysafe and does not cause any allergic reaction or skin irritation.The comment stated that the warning in andSection; 346.50(c)(2), ``Do notexceed the recommended daily dosage except under the advice and supervisionof a physician,'' would clutter the label without benefit to the consumerbecause petrolatum can be applied liberally to the affected anorectal areawithout hazard to the patient.Concerning the warning in andSection; 346.50(c)(3), ``If itching persistsfor more than 7 days, consult a physician,'' the comment argued that 7days is an arbitrary limitation because the dividing line between acuteand chronic conditions has not been shown to be 7 days. The comment addedthat including the warnings in andSection; 346.50(c) (1) and (3) would beredundant. The comment stated that the following warning is appropriatefor petrolatum: ``If symptoms continue to occur or increase, consult physician.''The warning recommended by the Panel in andSection; 346.50(c)(1) is a generalwarning for all anorectal drug products and is intended to inform the consumerof the period of time that is reasonable to allow for symptoms of anorectaldisorders to begin to show improvement or to clear. As discussed in comment44 above, the agency is proposing that andSection; 346.50(c)(1) be revisedin this tentative final monograph to read as follows: ``If condition worsensor does not improve within 7 days, consult a doctor.'' The agency concludesthat this warning should be required for all anorectal drugs, includingpetrolatum, in order to provide the consumer with appropriate limitation-of-useinformation for OTC anorectal drug products. The warning suggested by thecomment did not include this information.The warning in andSection; 346.50(c)(2) is also a general warning for allanorectal drug products. In the tentative final monograph for OTC skinprotectant drug products, published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of February 15, 1983 (48 FR 6820), the agencyproposed that the directions for use for petrolatum state, ``Apply liberallyas often as necessary.'' Because a warning such as in andSection; 346.50(c)(2)is not required for petrolatum in the skin protectant tentative final monograph,the agency is proposing that petrolatum be exempt from this warning inthis tentative final monograph.The general warning recommended by the Panel in andSection; 346.50(c)(3)for all anorectal drug products specifically addresses the condition ofitching. As revised, the warning in andSection; 346.50(c)(1), which addressesall conditions, makes the warning in andSection; 346.50(c)(3) repetitiveand unnecessary and it is not included in this tentative final monograph.49. One comment stated that the directions for anorectal drug productsrecommended by the Panel in andSection; 346.50(d) should not be listed separatelyfor external and intrarectal use. The comment contended that the directionswould be understood without putting them under separate headings, and thatrepeating each set of directions ``for all products'' is redundant andcontributes to label clutter.The agency agrees with the comment. As the Panel noted, many anorectalproducts may be used externally as well as intrarectally. The agency acknowledgesthis fact and has developed directions for use in this tentative finalmonograph that take into account the dual use of many of these products.However, there is certain additional directions information that appliesto intrarectal use only, e.g., use of a special applicator to apply theproduct into the rectum. In those cases, the agency believes that a specialheading indicating that these directions apply to intrarectal use is appropriate.50. Four comments opposed, and one comment favored, the following directionsrecommended by the Panel in andSection; 346.50(d)(2) for all anorectal drugproducts: ``When practical wash the anorectal area with mild soap and warmwater and rinse off all soap before application of this product.'' Thecomments contended that the statement is impractical and inappropriateand that it is not always convenient or even possible for the consumerto wash the anorectal area, especially after each bowel movement or whenaway from home. The comments argued that the Panel did not present evidencethat washing is safe and effective and that washing might not serve a usefulpurpose, but instead might aggravate painful burning and itching disorders.Two comments further stated that cleansing pads are a more comfortablealternative if soap and water irritate sensitive or broken skin. The commentin favor of these directions commended the Panel for emphasizing good analhygiene when treating anorectal disorders.The Panel was concerned about the importance of anal hygiene and statedthat washing the anorectal area daily and after each bowel movement withsoap and water and then carefully removing the soap greatly aids in therelief of anorectal symptoms and may prevent recurrence of perianal itching(45 FR 35584). The Panel also emphasized that, to avoid further irritation,the skin of the perianal area should be patted or blotted rather than rubbeddry.The agency agrees with the comments' suggestion that cleansing pads area suitable alternative to washing with soap and water, but recognizes thatcleansing pads may not always be available. Accordingly, the directionsproposed in this tentative final monograph, which appear in andSection; 346.50(d)(1),have been revised for clarity. In addition, the directions have also beenrevised because the agency is not including the Panel's recommended warningin andSection; 346.50(c)(7)(iii) for certain products for intrarectal use,``Do not use this product in children under 12 years of age except underthe advice and supervision of a physician.'' Rather, the directions inandSection; 346.50(d)(i) of this tentative final monograph have been revisedto state clearly that a doctor should be consulted before using any anorectaldrug product in children under 12 years of age to be more consistent withthe Panel's general discussion on pediatric dosages in which the Panelstated that most anorectal disorders in children are brought to a physicianfor evaluation and treatment (45 FR 35579). In light of the revised directions,the agency believes that the warning recommended by the Panel is repetitiousand unnecessary. The revised directions are as follows: ``<T3>Adults: </T3>``When practical, cleanse the affected area'' (selectone or both of the following: ``with mild soap and warm water and rinsethoroughly'' or ``by patting or blotting with an appropriate cleansingpad''). ``Gently dry by patting or blotting with toilet tissue or a softcloth before application of this product.'' [Other appropriate directionsmay be inserted here.] ``Children under 12 years of age: consult a doctor.''51. One comment urged deletion of the phrase ``or as directed by a physician''from the directions for petrolatum recommended by the Panel in andSection;346.56(d). The comment contended that the phrase is unnecessary and irrelevantfor petrolatum because petrolatum is not usually prescribed by physicians,and therefore its use is rarely directed or supervised by a physician.The comment further contended that in the unusual case when a physiciandoes direct the use of petrolatum, the physician's directions to the patientwould take precedence over the label directions without the need for astatement to that effect on the label.The agency agrees with the comment that the phrase ``or as directed bya physician'' is unnecessary in the directions for petrolatum. In addition,the agency believes that this phrase is unnecessary for any OTC anorectaldrug product and is not including it in this tentative final monograph.Deleting this phrase makes the directions for all anorectal drug productsconsistent with the directions for other OTC topically applied ingredientscontained in other tentative final monographs, i.e., skin protectants andexternal analgesics. (See comment 28 above.) 52. One comment objected to several of the Panel's Category II labelingrecommendations as being excessive and unnecessary. The comment disagreedwith the Panel's conclusion at 45 FR 35602 that the labeling claims ``simpleanorectal irritation,'' ``anorectal disorders,'' and ``simple inflammatoryrectal conditions'' are too general and contended that these terms areintended to encourage OTC hemorrhoidal drug use only in cases in whichmedical supervision is unnecessary. The comment added that labeling a hemorrhoidalproduct for a ``simple anorectal condition'' may be the best method ofencouraging consumers to obtain medical advice if the condition persistsor becomes a ``complicated'' anorectal condition. The agency agrees with the Panel that labeling claims such as ``simpleanorectal irritation,'' ``anorectal disorders,'' and ``simple inflammatoryrectal conditions'' are too general or unclear if used alone (45 FR 35602).Further, the agency finds that such labeling claims, when used alone, couldimply that OTC anorectal drug products treat diseases or conditions ratherthan relieve symptoms and, therefore, should remain in Category II. However,when these terms or similar terms are used with additional language describingthe relief of associated symptoms, e.g., itching, discomfort, etc., theresulting labeling claims clearly describe that OTC anorectal drugs areprimarily for the relief of symptoms and not the treatment of disease.Therefore, the agency is not proposing that the terms recommended by thecomment be used alone as labeling for anorectal drug products. However,these terms or similar terms when used with additional language are includedin the labeling proposed in andSection; 346.50(b). (See comment 40 above.)53. One comment objected to the Panel's criticism of labeling claims thatmay cause the consumer to believe that certain hemorrhoidal drug productsare superior to other available products for any of a number of reasons(45 FR 35602) and what the comment described as the Panel's impressionthat one hemorrhoidal drug product is as good as another. The Panel gave the following examples of labeling that may cause the consumerto believe that certain products are superior to other available products:``Contains no narcotic, anesthetic, or habit forming ingredients,'' ``nonnarcotic,''``without the use of narcotics,'' or ``contains no stinging, smarting astringents''(45 FR 35602). The Panel stated that these claims clearly imply a strongeror more effective product, greater safety, and that other products arenarcotics, anesthetics, or astringents and are harmful without any evidencethat this is so. The agency has reviewed currently marketed products andfinds no known marketed OTC anorectal drug products that contain narcotics.Therefore, the agency believes it would be inappropriate for manufacturersto state in the labeling of these products that the product ``containsno narcotic.'' However, because anesthetics are present in some OTC anorectalproducts, manufacturers could state in their labeling, if they wish, thatthe product ``contains no anesthetic.'' The agency is not aware of anydata that show that astringents incorporated into an ointment or suppositorybase cause stinging and smarting in the anorectal area and, thus, believesthat the statement ``contains no stinging, smarting astringents'' wouldbe inappropriate for anorectal drug products. N. Comments on Testing Guidelines.54. A number of comments disagreed with parts of the Panel's testing guidelinerequirements, e.g., that the pharmacologic action of ingredients must alwaysbe demonstrated in the anorectal area, that clinical relief of symptomsmust be correlated with pharmacologic activity, and that testing must beaccomplished within 7 days. The comments also criticized the criteria forselection of patients with anorectal disease, the use of a product's vehicleas the control, double-blind studies, and the dose and frequency limitations.Two comments suggested that the Panel's testing requirements for anorectaldrug products at 45 FR 35594 are more rigorous than for other drug entities,while another comment stated that the proposed requirements would limitmanufacturers and independent testing organizations to inappropriate andimpossible testing methods. Several comments supported the Panel's minorityopinion that extrapolation of data from tests performed in other areasof the body to the anorectal area is allowable (45 FR 35608 and 35652).The agency has not addressed specific testing guidelines in this document.In revising the OTC drug review procedures relating to Category III, publishedin the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of September 29, 1981 (46 FR 47730), the agencyadvised that tentative final and final monographs will not include recommendedtesting guidelines for conditions that industry wishes to upgrade to monographstatus. Instead, the agency will meet with industry representatives attheir request to discuss testing protocols. The revised procedures alsostate the time in which test data must be submitted for consideration indeveloping the final monograph. (See also part II. paragraph A.2. below_<T3>Testing of Category II and Category III conditions.</T3>) 55. A number of comments objected to the Panel's recommendation of finalformulation testing (bioavailability) for moving Category III anorectaldrug products to Category I. There were no comments supporting the Panel'sviews. Some comments stated that adopting this requirement as part of thefinal rule would violate the Panel's charter, which was to review dataon OTC ingredients and combinations, to make recommendations on their safetyand efficacy, and to avoid a product-by-product review. Several commentscited 21 CFR 320.22(b)(2) as providing for a waiver of in vivo bioavailabilityrequirements for topically applied preparations intended for local therapeuticeffect. The comments also stated that none of the anorectal ingredientsreviewed by the Panel has been cited as having bioavailability problems.Two of the comments contended that consideration of the bioavailabilityof anorectal drug products is irrelevant, and that the Panel had not supportedthe final formulation testing recommendation with any documentation. Onecomment from a biopharmaceutics expert who had written a letter in 1975(Ref. 1) that was reviewed and quoted by the Panel to support its conclusionto require final formulation testing for anorectal drug products (45 FR35586 to 35588) contended that the Panel misconstrued the content of theletter. The comment stated that final formulation testing is not necessaryfor safety because there would be no significant risk to the user evenif any of the Category I and III anorectal active ingredients were 100percent bioavailable systemically. Another comment agreed with the Panel'sminority report regarding final formulation testing (45 FR 35608, 35609,and 35652) and stated that ``final formulation testing would be wasteful,a threat to * * * viability as a hemorrhoidal drug marketer, and, ultimately,a financial detriment to consumers.'' FDA does not agree with the comment concerning the 1975 letter cited inthe Panel's report. After reviewing the Panel's discussion of its reasonsfor recommending final formulation testing (45 FR 35586 to 35588), it isevident that the Panel did not quote from the letter discussed in the summaryabove, nor does it appear that the letter was cited for the propositionmentioned in the comment.Although the Panel stated that final formulation testing of all ingredientsand combinations could not be avoided in its testing guidelines for placingCategory III ingredients and labeling in Category I (45 FR 35594 to 35598),the Panel also stated, and the agency concurs, that the use of a questionnaire,photography, and physician evaluation would be adequate to demonstratestatistically significant symptomatic improvement and would be acceptablefor proof of effectiveness for claims of symptomatic relief of burning,pain, itch, swelling (as in hemorrhoids and/or hemorrhoidal tissue) anddiscomfort due to these symptoms. While it is not clear whether the Panel intended testing of all products,including formulations containing Category I ingredients, FDA agrees withthe comments that final formulation testing should not be required foranorectal drug products because the products are topically applied andbecause, to date, there has been no demonstrated bioavailability problemwith any of the products at issue. The in vivo waiver provision of andSection;320.22(b)(2) for topically applied products reflects the fact that certaintopically applied products, that are applied directly to the site of drugaction, are less prone to bioavailability problems than are some otherdrugs and, accordingly, their bioavailability may, in some instances, bedetermined by means other than in vivo product testing. With regard tothe products subject to this monograph, FDA will not require in vivo bioavailabilitytesting, but will address product bioavailability in the context of themonograph requirements of (1) appropriate vehicles and other inactive ingredientsand (2) compliance with appropriate good manufacturing practices. Accordingly, the agency will not require final formulation testing of anorectaldrug products covered by a final monograph. Category I anorectal activeingredients may be formulated in appropriate vehicles without additionaltesting, provided the product is manufactured according to the regulationsfor the Current Good Manufacturing Practice for Finished Pharmaceuticals(21 CFR Part 211). Manufacturers should be aware that the newness of adosage, or method * * * of administration or application, or other conditionof use * * * may affect the ``newness'' of a drug. (See 21 CFR 310.(h)(5).)<ITAG tagnum="74">Reference </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Letter to J. K. Jones from S. Riegelman, March 13, 1975, OTC Volume120051. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">II. The Agency's Tentative Adoption of the Panel's Report </ITAG>A. Summary of Ingredient Categories and Testing of Category II and CategoryIII Conditions. <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Summary of ingredient categories. </ITAG>The agency has reviewed all claimed active ingredients submitted to thePanel, as well as other data and information available at this time, andhas made the following changes in the categorization of anorectal activeingredients recommended by the Panel. Because final formulation testing is not being proposed in this tentativefinal monograph, benzyl alcohol, dibucaine, dibucaine hydrochloride, dycloninehydrochloride, epinephrine, lidocaine, tetracaine, and tetracaine hydrochloridehave been reclassified from Category III to Category I for external use.(See comment 55 above.) However, these ingredients remain in Category IIIfor intrarectal use because of insufficient data to establish safety and/oreffectiveness for this use. Diperodon has been reclassified from CategoryII to Category III for external use while remaining in Category III forintrarectal use. (See comment 13 above.) For the convenience of the reader, the following tables are included asa summary of the categorization of anorectal active ingredients by thePanel and the proposed classification by the agency:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/>   <H1>Anorectal active ingredients</H1><H1>Panel </H1><H1>Agency </H1><H2>[(e) = external use; (i)=intrarectal use]</H2> <T3>Local anesthetics</T3><ITAG tagnum="3">Benzocaine </ITAG><D>I(e),III(i)</D><D> I(e),III(i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Benzyl alcohol </ITAG><D>III(e,i)</D><D> I(e),III(i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Dibucaine </ITAG><D>III(e,i)</D><D> I(e),III(i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Dibucaine hydrochloride </ITAG><D>III(e,i)</D><D> I(e),III(i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Diperodon </ITAG><D>II(e),III(i)</D><D> III(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Dyclonine hydrochloride </ITAG><D>III(e,i)</D><D> I(e),III(i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Lidocaine </ITAG><D>III(e,i)</D><D> I(e),III(i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Phenacaine hydrochloride </ITAG><D>II(e,i)</D><D> II(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Pramoxine hydrochloride </ITAG><D>I(e),III(i)</D><D> I(e),III(i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Tetracaine </ITAG><D>III(e,i)</D><D> I(e),III(i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Tetracaine hydrochloride </ITAG><D>III(e,i)</D><D> I(e),III(i)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"/><T3>Vasoconstrictors</T3><ITAG tagnum="3">Ephedrine sulfate </ITAG><D>I(e,i)</D><D> I(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Epinephrine </ITAG><D>III(e,i)</D><D> I(e),III(i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Epinephrine hydrochloride </ITAG><D>I(e),II(i)</D><D> I(e),II(i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Epinephrine undecylenate </ITAG><D>III(e),II(i)</D><D> III(e),II(i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Phenylephrine hydrochloride </ITAG><D>I(e,i)</D><D> I(e,i) </D><ITAG tagnum="22"/><T3>Protectants</T3><ITAG tagnum="3">Aluminum hydroxide gel </ITAG><D>I(e,i)</D><D> I(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Bismuth oxide </ITAG><D>III(e,i)</D><D> III(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Bismuth subcarbonate </ITAG><D>III(e,i)</D><D> III(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Bismuth subgallate </ITAG><D>III(e,i)</D><D> III(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Bismuth subnitrate </ITAG><D>II(e,i)</D><D> II(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Calamine \1\ </ITAG><D>I(e,i)</D><D> I(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Cocoa butter </ITAG><D>I(e,i)</D><D> I(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Cod liver oil \1\ </ITAG><D>I(e,i)</D><D> I(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Glycerin \2\ </ITAG><D>I(e) </D><D>I(e)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Kaolin </ITAG><D>I(e,i)</D><D> I(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Lanolin </ITAG><D>I(e,i)</D><D> I(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Lanolin alcohols \3\ </ITAG><D>I(e,i)</D><D> III(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Mineral oil </ITAG><D>I(e,i)</D><D> I(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Petrolatum </ITAG><D>Not reviewed </D><D>I(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Shark liver oil \1\ </ITAG><D>I(e,i)</D><D> I(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Topical starch \4\ </ITAG><D>I(e,i)</D><D> I(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">White petrolatum </ITAG><D>I(e,i)</D><D> I(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Zinc oxide \1\ </ITAG><D>I(e,i)</D><D> I(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"/><T3>Counterirritants</T3><ITAG tagnum="3">Camphor (greater than 3 to 11 percent)</ITAG><D>II(e,i)</D><D> II(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Hydrastis </ITAG><D>II(e,i)</D><D> II(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Juniper tar (1 to 5 percent) </ITAG><D>III(e,i)</D><D> N/A \5\</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Menthol (1.25 to 16 percent) </ITAG><D>II(e,i)</D><D> II(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Turpentine oil (rectified) (6 to 50 percent)</ITAG><D>II(e,i)</D><D> II(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"/><T3>Astringents</T3><ITAG tagnum="3">Calamine </ITAG><D>I(e,i)</D><D> I(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Tannic acid </ITAG><D>II(e,i)</D><D> II(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Hamamelis water, NF XI \2\</ITAG>, \6\<D>I(e) </D><D>I(e)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Zinc oxide </ITAG><D>I(e,i)</D><D> I(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"/><T3>Wound-healing agents</T3><ITAG tagnum="3">Cholecalciferol \7\ </ITAG><D>III(e,i)</D><D> III(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Cod liver oil </ITAG><D>III(e,i)</D><D> III(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Live yeast cell derivative </ITAG><D>III(e,i)</D><D> III(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Peruvian balsam </ITAG><D>III(e,i)</D><D> III(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Shark liver oil </ITAG><D>III(e,i)</D><D> III(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Vitamin A </ITAG><D>III(e,i)</D><D> III(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"/><T3>Antiseptics</T3><ITAG tagnum="3">Boric acid </ITAG><D>II(e,i)</D><D> II(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Boroglycerin </ITAG><D>II(e,i)</D><D> II(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Hydrastis </ITAG><D>II(e,i)</D><D> II(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Phenol </ITAG><D>II(e,i)</D><D> II(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Resorcinol </ITAG><D>III(e),II(i)</D><D> III(e),II(i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Sodium salicylic acid phenolate </ITAG><D>II(e,i)</D><D> II(e,i) </D><ITAG tagnum="22"/><T3>Keratolyics</T3><ITAG tagnum="3">Alcloxa \2\ </ITAG><D>I(e) </D><D>I(e)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Resorcinol </ITAG><D>I(e),II(i)</D><D> I(e),II(i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Precipitated sulfur </ITAG><D>III(e),II(i)</D><D> III(e),II(i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Sublimed sulfur </ITAG><D>III(e),II(i)</D><D> III(e),II(i) </D><ITAG tagnum="22"/><T3>Anticholinergics</T3><ITAG tagnum="3">Atropine </ITAG><D>II(e,i)</D><D> II(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Belladonna extract </ITAG><D>II(e,i)</D><D> II(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"/><T3>Analgesics, anesthetics, and antipruritics</T3><ITAG tagnum="3">Camphor (0.1 to 3 percent) </ITAG><D>N/A </D><D>I(e)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Juniper tar (1 to 5 percent) </ITAG><D>N/A </D><D>I(e)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Menthol (0.1 to 1 percent) </ITAG><D>N/A </D><D>I(e)</D><ITAG tagnum="22"/><T3>Miscellaneous</T3><ITAG tagnum="3">Collinsonia extract </ITAG><D>II(e,i)</D><D> II(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3"/><T3>E.coli</T3> vaccines <D>II(e,i)</D><D> II(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Hydrocortisone </ITAG><D>N/A </D><D>Ext. Anal.\8\</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Hydrocortisone acetate </ITAG><D>N/A </D><D>Ext. Anal.\8\</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Lappa extract </ITAG><D>II(e,i)</D><D> II(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Leptandra extract </ITAG><D>II(e,i)</D><D> II(e,i)</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Mullein </ITAG><D>II(e,i)</D><D> II(e,i) </D><F>\1\ For use only in combination and not as single ingredients. (Seecomment 30 above.) </F><F>\2\ Not categorized for intrarectal use. </F><F>\3\ ``Wool alcohols'' was the name designated by the Panel for thisingredient. ``Lanolin alcohols'' is the official title of this ingredientin the ``United States Pharmacopeia XXI_National Formulary XVI.''</F><F>\4\ ``Starch'' was the name designated by the Panel for this ingredient.``Topical starch'' is the official title of this ingredient in the ``UnitedStates Pharmacopeia XXI_National Formulary XVI.''</F><F>\5\ Juniper tar was redesigned an ``analgesic, anesthetic, and antipruritic''ingredient. (See Part II.B.6 below_</F><T3>Summary of the Agency's Changes in the Panel's Recommendations.)</T3><F>\6\ ``Witch hazel water'' was the name designated by the Panel for thisingredient. ``Hamamelis Water'' was last recognized as the official titleof this ingredient in National Formulary XI, and the agency has determinedthat this is the appropriate name for this ingredient.</F><F>\7\ ``Vitamin D'' was the name designated by the Panel for this ingredient.``Cholecalciferol'' is the official title of this ingredient in the ``UnitedStates Pharmacopeia XXI_National Formulary XVI.''</F><F>\8\ Hydrocortisone and hydrocortisone acetate were not reviewed by thePanel. These ingredients are being addressed in the rulemaking for OTCexternal analgesic drug products. (See comment 25 above.)</F></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Testing of Category II and Category III conditions. </ITAG>The Panel recommended testing guidelines for anorectal drug products (45FR 35594 to 35598). The agency's position regarding these testing guidelinesand regarding final formulation testing is discussed in comments 54 and55 above. Interested persons may communicate with the agency about thesubmission of data and information to demonstrate the safety or effectivenessof any anorectal ingredient or condition included in the review by followingthe procedures outlined in the agency's policy statement published in the<T4>Federal Register</T4> of September 29, 1981 (46 FR 47740) and clarifiedApril 1, 1983 (48 FR 14050). This policy statement includes proceduresfor the submission and review of proposed protocols, agency meetings withindustry or other interested persons, and agency communications on submittedtest data and other information. B. Summary of the Agency's Changes in the Panel's Recommendations FDA has considered the comments and other relevant information and concludesthat it will tentatively adopt the Panel's report and recommended monographwith the changes described in FDA's responses to the comments above andwith other changes described in the summary below. A summary of the changesmade by the agency follows.1. The agency is proposing dibucaine and dibucaine hydrochloride as CategoryI anorectal local anesthetics for external use in a concentration rangeof 0.25 to 1 percent for use up to 3 or 4 times daily. (See comment 12above.) The agency is also proposing the following anorectal ingredients as CategoryI for external use. (See part II. paragraph A. 1. above_<T3>Summary of ingredient categories</T3>.) The concentrations in thistentative final monograph are the equivalent of the dosages recommendedby the Panel for a 2-g or a 2-mL dosage unit. (a) Benzyl alcohol 1 to 4 percent. (b) Dyclonine hydrochloride 0.5 to 1 percent. (c) Lidocaine 2 to 5 percent. (d) Tetracaine and tetracaine hydrochloride 0.5 to 1 percent. (e) Epinephrine 0.005 to 0.01 percent. 2. In its recommended monograph, the Panel stated the amounts of the vasoconstrictoractive ingredients identified in andSection; 346.12 in terms of a given weightper 2-g or 2-mL dosage unit. The agency proposes that the ingredients beexpressed in terms of percentage concentration to be consistent with themanner of stating other ingredients in this tentative final monograph.Accordingly, the vasoconstrictor active ingredients in andSection; 346.12of this tentative final monograph are expressed as follows: (a) Ephedrine sulfate 0.1 to 1.25 percent. (b) Epinephrine 0.005 to 0.01 percent. (c) Epinephrine hydrochloride 0.005 to 0.01 percent (d) Phenylephrine hydrochloride 0.25 percent. The agency is aware that in the Panel's report (45 FR 35625) the statementis made that ``a 0.5 mg dose of phenylephrine hydrochloride in a 2 mL dosageunit is equal to the amount of phenylephrine used safely and effectivelyin producing nasal decongestion, as discussed in the September 9, 1976document at page 38399.'' The statement is incorrect and should have read``a 5-mg dose.'' Such a dose represents a concentration of 0.25 percentphenylephrine. 3. The agency is reclassifing lanolin alcohols from Category I to CategoryIII as protectants in OTC anorectal drug products. Lanolin alcohols werenot contained in any products submitted to the Panel for review, and theagency has no information on currently marketed anorectal drug productsthat contain these ingredients or on their appropriate concentration foranorectal protectant use. Such information is needed before lanolin alcoholscan be considered generally recognized as safe and effective as anorectalprotectants, and the agency invites public comment and the submission ofdata. 4. The agency is not requiring the final formulation testing of combinationdrug products recommended by the Panel. Accordingly, combinations of CategoryI ingredients from up to three different therapeutic categories that wereplaced in Category III by the Panel are reclassified in Category I. (Seecomment 31 above.) 5. The agency is proposing in andSection; 346.14(b) in this tentative finalmonograph that calamine, cod liver oil, shark liver oil, and zinc oxidenot be used alone but only in combination with other protectants to provideat least 50 percent by weight of the final product. Section 346.22 of thePanel's recommended monograph has been redesignated as andSection; 346.22(a)and has been expanded to clarify that any two, three, or four protectantsidentified in andSection; 346.14 may be combined, provided that any ingredientidentified in andSection; 346.14 is included at a level that contributesat least 12.5 percent by weight (e.g., 0.25 g of a 2-g dosage unit) andprovided that if any ingredient identified in andSection; 346.14(b) is presentin the combination, it must not exceed the concentration limit specifiedin andSection; 346.14(b). In addition, the combined percentage by weightof all protectants in the combination must be at least 50 percent of thefinal product (e.g., 1-g of a 2-g dosage unit). New andSection; 346.22(o)provides that the amount of zinc oxide in a combination may not exceed25 percent by weight per dosage unit. (See comment 30 above.) In addition,on its own initiative, the agency is expanding the list of protectant activeingredients in andSection; 346.14 to include petrolatum as well as whitepetrolatum. Although the use of white petrolatum in lieu of petrolatumresults in a more aesthetically pleasing anorectal ointment, the use ofwhite petrolatum is not medically necessary. 6. The agency is redesignating several ingredients that the Panel classifiedas ``counterirritants'' to be ``analgesic, anesthetic, and antipruritic''ingredients in this rulemaking. The Panel classified the ingredients camphor(1.6 to 7 percent), hydrastis (no concentration given), juniper tar (1to 5 percent), menthol (0.25 to 1 percent), and turpentine oil (no concentrationgiven) as counterirritants (45 FR 35640 to 35645). The Topical AnalgesicPanel also reviewed and classified camphor (0.1 to 3 percent), junipertar (1 to 5 percent), and menthol (0.1 to 1 percent) as analgesic, anesthetic,and antipruritic active ingredients (44 FR 69865) and camphor (3 to 11percent), menthol (1.25 to 16 percent), and turpentine oil (6 to 50 percent)as counterirritant ingredients (44 FR 69864 to 69865). The agency agreedwith that Panel's classifications in the tentative final monograph forOTC external analgesic drug products (48 FR 5852; February 8, 1983), andfurther clarified that menthol at a concentration of 0.1 to 1 percent wasan analgesic, anesthetic, or antipruritic and at a concentration of 1.25to 16 percent was a counterirritant. (See comment 6 at 48 FR 5855.) The Anorectal Panel classified menthol at a concentration of 0.25 to 1percent in aqueous solution as a counterirritant for the temporary reliefof itching in the anorectal area.Based on the agency's findings in the tentative final monograph for OTCexternal analgesic drug products and to promote consistency between therulemakings for anorectal and external analgesic drug products, the agencyis proposing to redesignate menthol below 1 percent as an analgesic, anesthetic,and antipruritic ingredient rather than as a counterirritant in the anorectalrulemaking and to revise its Category I concentration from 0.25 to 1 percentto 0.1 to 1 percent. Likewise, camphor 0.1 to 3 percent and juniper tar1 to 5 percent will be redesignated as analgesic, anesthetic, and antipruriticingredients in the anorectal rulemaking. The Anorectal Panel did not classifythese ingredients for these uses. However, because these ingredients areindicated for pain and itching of minor skin irritations when labeled asan external analgesic and for itching and discomfort when labeled for anorectal/hemorrhoidaluse, the agency has determined that menthol, camphor, and juniper tar atthe above concentrations should be listed as Category I analgesic, anesthetic,and antipruritic ingredients in the anorectal tentative final monograph.Camphor exceeding 3 percent to 11 percent, menthol 1.25 to 16 percent,and turpentine oil 6 to 50 percent are designated as counterirritants inthe anorectal rulemaking. Because the Anorectal Panel classified camphorand turpentine oil in Category II as counterirritants for anorectal use,they are not being included in this tentative final monograph. Likewise,the Panel did not propose Category I status for menthol above 1 percentas a counterirritant; therefore, it also is not being included in thistentative final monograph as a counterirritant. This approach is consistentwith the labeling of counterirritants in the external analgesic tentativefinal monograph because those products are used to relieve aches and painsof muscles and joints associated with backaches, arthritis, etc., and notto relieve itching and discomfort of minor skin irritations. Hydrastisalso remains in Category II as a counterirritant in OTC anorectal drugproducts. The agency is adding the definitions of ``analgesic, anesthetic'' and ``antipruritic''to this tentative final monograph to be consistent with those definitionsas proposed in the tentative final monograph for OTC external analgesicdrug products. (See the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of February 8, 1983; 48 FR 5852.) In addition,the agency is not including the definition of counterirritant in this tentativefinal monograph. 7. The agency is redesignating Subpart D as Subpart C and is placing thelabeling sections of the tentative final monograph in Subpart C. To improveclarity and to eliminate duplicative words and phrases, the agency hasshortened and simplified the general indications and the indications recommendedby the Panel for different therapeutic categories. (See comment 40 above.)In some cases, the agency has eliminated indications from the differenttherapeutic categories when the same or very similar indications were alreadypart of the general indications. 8. The agency is proposing that the term ``hemorrhoidal'' be allowed toappear alone or in parentheses next to the term ``anorectal'' as the statementof identity for all OTC anorectal drug products. (See comment 38 above.)9. The agency is proposing in andSection; 346.50(b) that certain labelingstatements may be combined in the labeling of anorectal combination drugproducts. The agency is proposing in andSection; 346.54 that indications,warnings, and directions applicable to each active ingredient of the combinationproduct may be combined, respectively, to eliminate duplicative words orphrases so that the resulting information is clear and understandable.10. Cosmetic-related terms, such as ``bland,'' ``soothing,'' ``lubrication,''``lubricates,'' ``* * * soften and lubricate dry * * *'' are not includedin the labeling for protectants in andSection; 346.50(b)(iii) of this tentativefinal monograph. The agency's policy on such labeling was stated in thetentative final monograph for OTC skin protectant drug products. (See 48FR 6827, comment 22.) 11. In andSection; 346.52(c)(1), andSection; 346.56(c)(2), andSection; 346.58(c),and andSection; 346.62(c)(1)(i), the Panel recommended the use of the signalword ``Caution'' in labeling for which the heading ``Warnings'' was alsorecommended. The agency notes that historically there has not been a consistentusage of the signal words ``warning'' and ``caution'' in OTC drug labeling.For example, in andSection; 369.20 and andSection; 369.21 (21 CFR 369.20 and369.21), which list ``warning'' and ``caution'' statements for drugs, thesignal words ``warning'' and ``caution'' are both used. In some instances,either of these signal words is used to convey the same or similar precautionaryinformation. FDA has considered which of these signal words would be most likely toattract consumers' attention to that information describing conditionsunder which the drug product should not be used or its use should be discontinued.The agency concludes that the signal word ``warning'' is more likely toflag potential dangers so that consumers will read the information beingconveyed. Therefore, FDA has determined that the signal word ``warning,''rather than the word ``caution,'' will be used routinely in OTC drug labelingthat is intended to alert consumers to potential safety problems. 12. In an effort to simplify OTC drug labeling, the agency proposed ina number of tentative final monographs to substitute the word ``doctor''for ``physician'' in OTC drug monographs on the basis that the word ``doctor''is more commonly used and better understood by consumers. Based on commentsreceived to these proposals, the agency has determined that final monographsand any applicable OTC drug regulation will give manufacturers the optionof using either the word ``physician'' or the word ``doctor.'' This tentativefinal monograph includes that option. 13. The Panel's recommendations concerning a ``box border'' and variousgraphic effects for highlighting warnings on anorectal drug products arenot included in andSection; 346.50(c). (See comment 42 above.)14. The agency is revising the general. warning in andSection; 346.50(c)(1)to read as follows: ``If condition worsens or does not improve within 7days, consult a doctor.'' The agency is not including the general warning recommended by the Panelin andSection; 346.50(c)(3), ``If itching persists for more than 7 days,consult a physician,'' because the revised warning in proposed andSection;346.50(c)(1) addresses all conditions, not just itching. (See comment 48above.) The agency is proposing in andSection; 346.56(c)(3) that petrolatum be exemptfrom the warning in andSection; 346.50(c)(2), ``Do not exceed the recommendeddaily dosage unless directed by a doctor.'' 15. The agency is revising the warning recommended by the Panel in andSection;346.50(c)(7)(ii) for clarity, to read as follows: ``Do not use this productwith an applicator if the introduction of the applicator into the rectumcauses additional pain. Consult a doctor promptly.'' (See comment 45 above.)16. The agency is not including the Panel's recommended warning in andSection;346.52(c)(2) for products containing local anesthetics for external usebecause it would be repetitive of the general warning proposed in andSection;346.50(c)(4). (See comment 46 above.) 17. The agency is proposing that anorectal vasoconstrictors bear the samewarnings for anorectal use as for bronchodilator and nasal decongestantuse. These warnings include the following: ``Do not use this product ifyou have heart disease, high blood pressure, thyroid disease, diabetes,or difficulty in urination due to enlargement of the prostate gland unlessdirected by a doctor''; and the drug interaction precaution ``Do not usethis product if you are presently taking a prescription drug for high bloodpressure or depression, without first consulting your doctor.'' The agencyis proposing the following additional warning for ephedrine sulfate: ``Someusers of this product may experience nervousness, tremor, sleeplessness,nausea, and loss of appetite. If these symptoms persist or become worse,consult your doctor.'' (See comment 47 above.) 18. The Panel's recommended warning and directions for use for lanolin(wool) alcohols (andSection; 346.56 (c)(2) and (d)(12)) are not includedin this tentative monograph because lanolin alcohols are being reclassifiedfrom Category I to Category III as anorectal protectants. (See part II.paragraph B.3. above.) 19. The agency is not accepting the Panel's recommendation to have completeand separate directions for products labeled for both external and intrarectaluse. Rather, the agency has developed directions for use that take intoaccount the dual use of these products. (See comment 49 above.) 20. The Panel's recommended directions in andSection; 346.50(d)(2) (redesignatedas andSection; 346.50(d)(1)) has been revised for clarity as follows: ``<T3>Adults</T3>: ``When practical, cleanse the affected area'' (selectone or both of the following: ``with mild soap and warm water and rinsethoroughly'' or ``by patting or blotting with an appropriate cleansingpad''). ``Gently dry by patting or blotting with toilet tissue or a softcloth before application of this product.'' [Other appropriate directionsmay be inserted here.] ``Children under 12 years of age: consult a doctor.''(See comment 50 above.) 21. The agency is not proposing the phrase ``or as directed by a physician''in the directions for any anorectal product in this tentative final monograph.The directions for use of petrolatum have been revised to be consistentwith the directions in the skin protectant tentative final monograph, sothat proposed andSection; 346.56(d)(6) reads ``Apply liberally as often asnecessary.'' (See comments 28 and 51 above.) 22. A claim for hydrocortisone and hydrocortisone acetate for the temporaryrelief of anal itching is already included in the tentative final monographfor OTC external analgesic drug products. In a future issue of the <T4>Federal Register</T4>, the agency will amend that tentative final monographso that external analgesic drug products containing hydrocortisone or hydrocortisoneacetate and bearing claims for the relief of ``anal itching'' would alsobear the appropriate warnings and directions for anorectal drug products.(See comment 25 above.) The agency is proposing to remove the existing labeling requirements ofandSection; 310.201(a)(23)(v)(b) (21 CFR 310.201(a)(23)(v)(<T3>b</T3>)) relating to dyclonine hydrochloride at the time that a finalmonograph for OTC anorectal drug products becomes effective. In addition,the agency is proposing to revise andSection; 369.20 to remove the referenceto rectal preparations from the entry for ``BELLADONNA PREPARATIONS * **'' and to remove the entry for ``RECTAL PREPARATIONS FOR EXTERNAL USE''because these entries will be superseded by a final monograph for OTC anorectaldrug products. The agency has examined the economic consequences of this proposed rulemakingin conjunction with other rules resulting from the OTC drug review. Ina notice published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of February 8, 1983 (48 FR 5806), the agencyannounced the availability of an assessment of these economic impacts.The assessment determined that the combined impacts of all the rules resultingfrom the OTC drug review do not constitute a major rule according to thecriteria established by Executive Order 12291. The agency therefore concludesthat no one of these rules, including this proposed rule for OTC anorectaldrug products, is a major rule. The economic assessment also concluded that the overall OTC drug reviewwas not likely to have a significant economic impact on a substantial numberof small entities as defined in the Regulatory Flexibility Act, Pub. L.96-354. That assessment included a discretionary Regulatory FlexibilityAnalysis in the event that an individual rule might impose an unusual ordisproportionate impact on small entities. However, this particular rulemakingfor OTC anorectal drug products is not expected to pose such an impacton small businesses. Therefore, the agency certifies that this proposedrule, if implemented, will not have a significant economic impact on asubstantial number of small entities.The agency invites public comment regarding any substantial or significanteconomic impact that this rulemaking would have on OTC anorectal drug products.Types of impact may include, but are not limited to, costs associated withproduct testing, relabeling, repackaging, or reformulating. Comments regardingthe impact of this rulemaking on OTC anorectal drug products should beaccompanied by appropriate documentation. Because the agency has not previouslyinvited specific comment on the economic impact of the OTC drug reviewon anorectal drug products, a period of 120 days from the date of publicationof this proposed rulemaking in the<T4> Federal Register</T4> will be provided for comments on this subjectto be developed and submitted. The agency will evaluate any comments andsupporting data that are received and will reassess the economic impactof this rulemaking in the preamble to the final rule. The agency has carefully considered the potential environmental effectsof that action. FDA has concluded that the action will not have a significantimpact on the human environment, and that an environmental impact statementis not required. The agency's finding of no significant impact and theevidence supporting that finding, contained in an environmental assessment,may be seen in the Dockets Management Branch (address above) between 9a.m. and 4 p.m., Monday through Friday. This action was considered underFDA's final rule implementing the National Environmental Policy Act (21CFR Part 25). Interested persons may, on or before December 13, 1988 submit to the DocketsManagement Branch (HFA-305), Food and Drug Administration, Rm. 4-62, 5600Fishers Lane, Rockville, MD 20857, written comments, objections, or requestsfor oral hearing before the Commissioner on the proposed regulation. Arequest for an oral hearing must specify points to be covered and timerequested. Written comments on the agency's economic impact determinationmay be submitted on or before December 13, 1988. Three copies of all comments,objections, and requests are to be submitted, except that individuals maysubmit one copy. Comments, objections, and requests are to be identifiedwith the docket number found in brackets in the heading of this documentand may be accompanied by a supporting memorandum or brief. Comments, objections,and requests may be seen in the office above between 9 a.m. and 4 p.m.,Monday through Friday. Any scheduled oral hearing will be announced inthe<T4> Federal Register</T4>. Interested persons, on or before August 15, 1989, may also submit in writingnew data demonstrating the safety and effectiveness of those conditionsnot classified in Category I. Written comments on the new data may be submittedon or before October 15, 1989. These dates are consistent with the timeperiods specified in the agency's final rule revising the procedural regulationsfor reviewing and classifying OTC drugs, published in the<T4> Federal Register</T4> of September 29, 1981 (46 FR 47730). Three copiesof all data and comments on the data are to be submitted, except that individualsmay submit one copy, and all data and comments are to be identified withthe docket number found in brackets in the heading of this document. Dataand comments should be addressed to the Dockets Management Branch (HFA-305)(address above). Received data and comments may also be seen in the officeabove between 9 a.m. and 4 p.m., Monday through Friday.In establishing a final monograph, the agency will ordinarily consideronly data submitted prior to the closing of the administrative record onOctober 15, 1988. Data submitted after the closing of the administrativerecord will be reviewed by the agency only after a final monograph is publishedin the<T4> Federal Register</T4>, unless the Commissioner finds good cause hasbeen shown that warrants earlier consideration. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 21 CFR </ITAG>21 CFR Part 310Administrative practice and procedure, Drugs, New drugs, Prescription exemption,Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.21 CFR Part 346 Anorectal drug products, Labeling, Over-the-counter drugs. 21 CFR Part 369 Labeling, Over-the-counter drugs, Warning and caution statements. Therefore, under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act and the AdministrativeProcedure Act, it is proposed that Subchapter D of Chapter I of Title 21of the Code of Federal Regulations be amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 310_NEW DRUGS </ITAG>1. The authority citation for 21 CFR Part 310 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 502, 503, 505, 701, 52 Stat. 1051, 1052, 1053,1055 as amended (21 U.S.C. 352, 353, 355, 371); 5 U.S.C. 553; 21 CFR 5.10and 5.11. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80"> andSection; 310.201</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> [Amended] </ITAG>2. Section 310.201 <T3>Exemption for certain drugs limited by new-drug applications to prescriptionsale </T3>is amended by removing paragraph (a)(23)(v)(<T3>b</T3>) and reserving it. <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 346_ANORECTAL DRUG PRODUCTS FOR OVER-THE-COUNTER HUMAN USE </ITAG>3. Part 346 is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General Provisions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">346.1 Scope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">346.3 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Active Ingredients  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">346.10 Local anesthetic active ingredients. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">346.12 Vasoconstrictor active ingredients. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">346.14 Protectant active ingredients. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">346.16 Analgesic, anesthetic, and antipruritic active ingredients.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">346.18 Astringent active ingredients. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">346.20 Keratolytic active ingredients. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">346.22 Permitted combinations of anorectal active ingredients.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72"> Subpart C_Labeling </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">346.50 Labeling of anorectal drug products. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">346.52 Labeling of permitted combinations of anorectal active ingredients.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 201(p), 502, 505, 701, 52 Stat. 1041-1042 asamended, 1050-1053 as amended, 1055-1056 as amended by 70 Stat. 919 and72 Stat. 948 (21 U.S.C. 321(p), 352, 355, 371); 5 U.S.C. 553; 21 CFR 5.10and 5.11. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General Provisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 346.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Scope. </ITAG>(a) An over-the-counter anorectal drug product in a form suitable for external(topical) or intrarectal (rectal) administration is generally recognizedas safe and effective and is not misbranded if it meets each conditionin this part and each general condition established in andSection; 330.1of this chapter. (b) References in this part to regulatory sections of the Code of FederalRegulations are to Chapter I of Title 21 unless otherwise noted.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 346.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>As used in this part: (a)<T3> Analgesic, anesthetic drug</T3>. A topically (externally) applieddrug that relieves pain by depressing cutaneous sensory receptors. (b)<T3> Anorectal drug</T3>. A drug that is used to relieve symptoms causedby anorectal disorders in the anal canal, perianal area, and/or the lowerrectal areas. (c)<T3> Antipruritic drug</T3>. A topically (externally) applied drug thatrelieves itching by depressing cutaneous sensory receptors. (d)<T3> Astringent drug</T3>. A drug that is applied to the skin or mucousmembranes for a local and limited protein coagulant effect. (e)<T3> External use</T3>. Topical application of an anorectal drug productto the skin of the perianal area and/or the skin of the anal canal. (f)<T3> Intrarectal use</T3>. Topical application of an anorectal drug productto the mucous membrane of the rectum. (g)<T3> Keratolytic drug</T3>. A drug that causes desquamation (loosening)and debridement or sloughing of the surface cells of the epidermis. (h)<T3> Local anesthetic drug</T3>. A drug that produces local disappearanceof pain, burning, itching, irritation, and/or discomfort by reversiblyblocking nerve conduction when applied to nerve tissue in appropriate concentrations.(i)<T3> Protectant drug</T3>. A drug that provides a physical barrier, forminga protective coating over skin or mucous membranes. (j)<T3> Vasoconstrictor drug</T3>. A drug that causes temporary constrictionof blood vessels. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Active Ingredients </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 346.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Local anesthetic active ingredients. </ITAG>The active ingredient of the product consists of any of the following whenused within the concentrations established for each ingredient: (a) Benzocaine 5 to 20 percent.(b) Benzyl alcohol 1 to 4 percent. (c) Dibucaine 0.25 to 1 percent. (d) Dibucaine hydrochloride 0.25 to 1 percent. (e) Dyclonine hydrochloride 0.5 to 1 percent. (f) Lidocaine 2 to 5 percent. (g) Pramoxine hydrochloride 1 percent. (h) Tetracaine 0.5 to 1 percent. (i) Tetracaine hydrochloride 0.5 to 1 percent. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 346.12</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Vasoconstrictor active ingredients. </ITAG>The active ingredient of the product consists of any of the following whenused within the concentrations established for each ingredient: (a) Ephedrine sulfate 0.1 to 1.25 percent. (b) Epinephrine 0.005 to 0.01 percent. (c) Epinephrine hydrochloride 0.005 to 0.01 percent. (d) Phenylephrine hydrochloride 0.25 percent. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 346.14</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Protectant active ingredients. </ITAG>(a) The following active ingredients may be used as the sole protectantactive ingredient in a product if the ingredient as identified constitutes50 percent or more by weight of the final product. In addition, the followingactive ingredients may be used in combinations in accordance with andSection;346.22 (a), (b), or (n). (1) Aluminum hydroxide gel. (2) Cocoa butter. (3) Glycerin in a 20- to 45-percent (weight/weight) aqueous solution. (4) Kaolin. (5) Lanolin. (6) Mineral oil. (7) Petrolatum. (8) Topical starch. (9) White petrolatum. (b) The following active ingredients may not be used as a sole protectantingredient but may be used in combination with one, two, or three otherprotectant active ingredients in accordance with andSection; 346.22 (a),(b), (n), and (o) and with the following limitations: (1) Calamine not to exceed 25 percent by weight per dosage unit (basedon the zinc oxide content of calamine). (2) Cod liver oil, provided that the product is labeled so that the amountof the product that is used in a 24-hour period represents a quantity thatprovides 10,000 U.S.P. units of vitamin A and 400 U.S.P. units of cholecalciferol.(3) Shark liver oil, provided that the product is labeled so that the amountof the product that is used in a 24-hour period represents a quantity thatprovides 10,000 U.S.P. units of vitamin A and 400 U.S.P. units of cholecalciferol.(4) Zinc oxide not to exceed 25 percent by weight per dosage unit. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 346.16</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Analgesic, anesthetic, and antipruritic active ingredients. </ITAG>The active ingredient of the product consists of any of the following whenused within the concentrations established for each ingredient: (a) Camphor 0.1 to 3 percent. (b) Juniper tar 1 to 5 percent. (c) Menthol 0.1 to 1 percent. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 346.18</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Astringent active ingredients. </ITAG>The active ingredient of the product consists of any of the following whenused within the concentrations established for each ingredient:(a) Calamine, within a concentration of 5 to 25 percent by weight per dosageunit (based on the zinc oxide content of calamine). (b) Hamamelis water, NF XI, 10 to 50 percent. (c) Zinc oxide, within a concentration of 5 to 25 percent by weight perdosage unit. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 346.20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Keratolytic active ingredients. </ITAG>The active ingredient of the product consists of any of the following whenused within the concentrations established for each ingredient: (a) Alcloxa 0.2 to 2 percent. (b) Resorcinol 1 to 3 percent. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 346.22 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Permitted combinations of anorectal active ingredients. </ITAG>(a) Any two, three, or four protectants identified in andSection; 346.14may be combined, provided that the combined percentage by weight of allprotectants in the combination is at least 50 percent of the final product(e.g., 1 gram of a 2-gram dosage unit). Any protectant ingredient includedin the combination must be present at a level that contributes at least12.5 percent by weight (e.g., 0.25 gram of a 2-gram dosage unit), exceptcod liver oil and shark liver oil. If an ingredient in andSection; 346.14(b)is included in the combination, it must not exceed the concentration limitspecified in andSection; 346.14(b). (b) Any single anorectal ingredient identified in andSection; 346.10, andSection;346.12, andSection; 346.16, andSection; 346.18, or andSection; 346.20 may becombined with up to four protectants in accordance with paragraph (a) ofthis section. (c) Any single local anesthetic identified in andSection; 346.10 may be combinedwith any single vasoconstrictor identified in andSection; 346.12. (d) Any single local anesthetic identified in andSection; 346.10 may be combinedwith any single astringent identified in andSection; 346.18. (e) Any single local anesthetic identified in andSection; 346.10 may be combinedwith any single keratolytic identified in andSection; 346.20. (f) Any single vasoconstrictor identified in andSection; 346.12 may be combinedwith any single astringent identified in andSection; 346.18. (g) Any single analgesic, anesthetic, and antipruritic identified in andSection;346.16 may be combined with any single astringent identified in andSection;346.18. (h) Any single analgesic, anesthetic, and antipruritic identified in andSection;346.16 may be combined with any single keratolytic identified in andSection;346.20. (i) Any single astringent identified in andSection; 346.18 may be combinedwith any single keratolytic identified in andSection; 346.20. (j) Any single local anesthetic identified in andSection; 346.10 may be combinedwith any single vasoconstrictor identified in andSection; 346.12 and withany single astringent identified in andSection; 346.18.(k) Any single local anesthetic identified in andSection; 346.10 may be combinedwith any single astringent identified in andSection; 346.18 and with anysingle keratolytic identified in andSection; 346.20. (1) Any single vasoconstrictor identified in andSection; 346.12 may be combinedwith any single analgesic, anesthetic, and antipruritic identified in andSection;346.16 and with any single astringent identified in andSection; 346.18. (m) Any single analgesic, anesthetic, and antipruritic identified in andSection;346.16 may be combined with any single astringent identified in andSection;346.18 and with any single keratolytic identified in andSection; 346.20.(n) Any combination of ingredients listed in paragraphs (c) through (m)of this section may be combined with up to four protectants in accordancewith paragraph (a) of this section. (o) Any product containing calamine for use as a protectant and/or as anastringent and/or containing zinc oxide for use as a protectant and/oras an astringent may not have a total weight of zinc oxide exceeding 25percent by weight per dosage unit. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Labeling </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 346.50 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Labeling of anorectal drug products. </ITAG>The labeling of the product contains the following information for anorectalingredients identified in andSection;andSection; 346.10, 346.12, 346.14, 346.16,346.18, and 346.20, and for combinations of anorectal ingredients identifiedin andSection; 346.22. Unless otherwise specified, the labeling in this subpartis applicable to anorectal drug products for both external and intrarectaluse. (a) <T3>Statement of identity. </T3>The labeling of the product contains theestablished name of the drug, if any, and identifies the product as ``anorectal(hemorrhoidal),'' ``hemorrhoidal,'' ``hemorrhoidal (anorectal) (insertdosage form, e.g., cream, lotion, or ointment).'' (b) <T3>Indications. </T3>The labeling of the product states, under the heading``Indications,'' any of the phrases listed in this paragraph (b), as appropriate.Other truthful and nonmisleading statements, describing only the indicationsfor use that have been established and listed in this paragraph, may alsobe used, as provided in andSection; 330.1(c)(2), subject to the provisionsof section 502 of the act relating to misbranding and the prohibition insection 301(d) of the act against the introduction or delivery for introductioninto interstate commerce of unapproved new drugs in violation of section505(a) of the act. (1) (``For the temporary relief of,'' ``Gives temporary relief of,'' or``Helps relieve the'') (As an option, select one or both of the following:``local'' or ``anorectal'') [select one or more of the following: ``discomfort,''``itching,'' or ``itching and discomfort,'' followed by: ``in the perianalarea'' or ``associated with'' (select one or more of the following: ``hemorrhoids,''``anorectal disorders,'' ``inflamed hemorrhoidal tissues,'' ``anorectalinflammation,'' ``hemorrhoidal tissues,'' or ``piles (hemorrhoids).'')](2) <T3>Additional indications. </T3>Indications applicable to each activeingredient of the product may be combined to eliminate duplicative wordsor phrases so that the resulting indication is clear and understandable.In addition to the indication identified in paragraph (b)(1) of this section,the labeling of the product intended for external or intrarectal use mayalso contain the following indications, as appropriate. (i) <T3>For products for external use only containing any ingredient identifiedin andSection; 346.10. </T3>``For the temporary relief of'' (select one ormore of the following: ``pain,'' ``soreness,'' or ``burning''). (ii) <T3>For products containing epinephrine or epinephrine hydrochloride identifiedin andSection; 346.12 (b) and (c) for external use only, and for productscontaining ephedrine sulfate or phenylephrine hydrochloride identifiedin andSection; 346.12 (a) and (d). </T3>(A) ``Temporarily reduces the swelling associated with'' (select one ofthe following: ``irritated hemorrhoidal tissue and other anorectal disorders''or ``irritation in hemorrhoids and other anorectal disorders''). (B) ``Temporarily shrinks hemorrhoidal tissue.''(iii) <T3>For products for external use only containing glycerin identified inandSection; 346.14(a)(3) and for products for external and/or intrarectaluse containing any protectant identified in andSection; 346.14(a) (2), (5)through (9), and (b) (1) through (4). </T3>(A) ``Temporarily forms a protective coating over inflamed tissues to helpprevent drying of tissues.'' (B) ``Temporarily protects irritated areas.'' (C) ``Temporarily relieves burning.'' (D) ``Provides temporary relief from skin irritations.'' (E) ``Temporarily provides a coating for relief of anorectal discomforts.''(F) ``Temporarily protects the inflamed, irritated anorectal surface''(select one of the following: ``to help make bowel movements less painful''or ``from irritation and abrasion during bowel movement''). (G) ``Temporarily protects inflamed perianal skin.'' (H) ``Temporarily relieves the symptoms of perianal skin irritation.''(iv) <T3>For products containing aluminum hydroxide gel identified in andSection;346.14(a)(1) and for products containing kaolin identified in andSection;346.14(a)(4). </T3>``For the temporary relief of itching associated withmoist anorectal conditions.'' (v) <T3>For products for external use only containing any analgesic, anesthetic,and antipruritic identified in andSection; 346.16. </T3>(A) ``For the temporary relief of'' (select one or both of the following:``pain'' or ``burning''). (B) ``Can help distract from pain.'' (C) ``May provide a cooling sensation.''(vi) <T3>For products for external use only containing hamamelis water identifiedin andSection; 346.18(b), and for products for external use and/or intrarectaluse containing calamine or zinc oxide identified in 346.18 (a) and (c).</T3>(A) ``Aids in protecting irritated anorectal areas.'' (B) ``Temporary relief of'' (select one or both of the following' ``irritation''or ``burning''). (vii) <T3>For products for external use only containing any ingredient identifiedin andSection; 346.20. </T3>The indication in paragraph (b)(1) of this sectionapplies. (c) <T3>Warnings. </T3>Warnings applicable to each active ingredient of theproduct may be combined to eliminate duplicative words or phrases so thatthe resulting warning is clear and understandable. The labeling of theproduct contains the following warnings under the heading ``Warnings'':(1) ``If condition worsens or does not improve within 7 days, consult adoctor.'' (2) ``Do not exceed the recommended daily dosage unless directed by a doctor.''(3) ``In case of bleeding, consult a doctor promptly.'' (4) <T3>For products for external use only. </T3>``Do not put this productinto the rectum by using fingers or any mechanical device or applicator.''(5) <T3>For products for intrarectal use to be used with a special applicatorsuch as a pile pipe or other mechanical device. </T3>``Do not use thisproduct with an applicator if the introduction of the applicator into therectum causes additional pain. Consult a doctor promptly.'' (6) <T3>For products for external use only containing any local anestheticidentified in 346.10, menthol identified in andSection; 346.16(c), or resorcinolidentified in andSection; 346.20(b). </T3>``Certain persons can develop allergicreactions to ingredients in this product. If the symptom being treateddoes not subside or if redness, irritation, swelling, pain, or other symptomsdevelop or increase, discontinue use and consult a doctor.'' (7) <T3>For products containing any vasoconstrictor identified in andSection;346.12.</T3> (i) ``Do not use this product if you have heart disease, high blood pressure,thyroid disease, diabetes, or difficulty in urination due to enlargementof the prostate gland unless directed by a doctor.'' (ii) <T3>``Drug interaction precaution. </T3>Do not use this product if youare presently taking a prescription drug for high blood pressure or depression,without first consulting your doctor.'' (iii) For products containing ephedrine sulfate identified in andSection;346.12(a). ``Some users of this product may experience nervousness, tremor,sleeplessness, nausea, and loss of appetite. If these symptoms persistor become worse, consult your doctor.'' (8) <T3>For products containing aluminum hydroxide gel identified in andSection;346.14(a)(1) and for products containing kaolin identified in andSection;346.14(a)(4). </T3>``Remove petrolatum or greasy ointment before usingthis product because they interfere with the ability of this product toadhere properly to the skin area.'' (9) <T3>For products for external use only containing resorcinol identifiedin andSection; 346.20(b). </T3>``Do not use on open wounds near the anus.''(d) <T3>Directions. </T3>Directions applicable to each active ingredient ofthe product may be combined to eliminate duplicative words or phrases sothat the resulting information is clear and understandable. The labelingof the product contains the following information under the heading ``Directions'':(1) <T3>``Adults: </T3>When practical, cleanse the affected area'' (selectone or both of the following: ``with mild soap and warm water and rinsethoroughly'' or ``by patting or blotting with an appropriate cleansingpad''). ``Gently dry by patting or blotting with toilet tissue or a softcloth before application of this product.'' [Other appropriate directionsin this section may be inserted here.] ``Children under 12 years of age:consult a doctor.'' (2) <T3>For products for external use only. </T3>``Apply externally to theaffected area'' (insert appropriate time interval of administration asidentified in paragraphs (d)(6), (7), (8), or (9) of this section).(3) <T3>For products for external use that are pads containing anorectal ingredients.</T3>``Gently apply to the affected area by patting and then discard.''(4) <T3>For products for intrarectal use that are wrapped suppositories. </T3>``Removewrapper before inserting into the rectum.'' (5) <T3>For products for intrarectal use that are to be used with a specialapplicator such as a pile pipe or other mechanical device. </T3>``FOR INTRARECTALUSE: Attach applicator to tube. Lubricate applicator well, then gentlyinsert applicator into the rectum.'' (6) <T3>For products for external use only containing any of the local anestheticsidentified in andSection; 346.10; analgesics, anesthetics, and antipruriticsidentified in andSection; 346.16; or alcloxa or resorcinol identified inandSection; 346.20. </T3>Apply to the affected area up to 6 times daily.(i) <T3>For products for external use only containing dibucaine or dibucainehydrochloride identified in andSection; 346.10 (c) and (d). </T3>Apply tothe affected area up to 3 or 4 times daily. (ii) <T3>For products for external use only containing pramoxine hydrochlorideidentified in andSection; 346.10(g). </T3>Apply to the affected area up to5 times daily. (7) <T3>For products containing vasoconstrictors identified in andSection; 346.12.</T3>Apply to the affected area up to 4 times daily. (8) <T3>For products for external use only containing glycerin identified inandSection; 346.14(a)(3) or hamamelis water identified in andSection; 346.18(b),and for products for external and/or intrarectal use containing any protectantidentified in andSection; 346.14(a) (1), (2), (4), (5), (6), and (8), and(b) (1), (2), (3), and (4), or any astringent identified in andSection; 346.18(a) and (c). </T3>Apply to the affected area up to 6 times daily or aftereach bowel movement. (9) <T3>For products containing petrolatum or white petrolatum identified inandSection; 346.14(a) (7) and (9). </T3>Apply liberally to the affected areaas often as necessary. (e) The word ``physician'' may be substituted for the word ``doctor'' inany of the labeling statements in this section. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 346.52</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Labeling of permitted combinations of anorectal active ingredients.</ITAG>Statements of identity, indications, warnings, and directions for use,respectively, applicable to each ingredient in the product may be combinedto eliminate duplicative words or phrases so that the resulting informationis clear and understandable. (a) <T3>Statement of identity. </T3>For a combination drug product that hasan established name, the labeling of the product states the establishedname of the combination drug product, followed by the statement of identityfor each ingredient in the combination, as established in the statementof identity sections of this part. For a combination drug product thatdoes not have an established name, the labeling of the product states thestatement of identity for each ingredient in the combination, as establishedin the statement of identity sections of this subpart. (b) <T3>Indications. </T3>The labeling of the product states, under the heading``Indications,'' the indication(s) for each ingredient in the combination,as established in the indications sections of this subpart. (c) <T3>Warnings. </T3>The labeling of the product states, under the heading``Warnings,'' the warning(s) for each ingredient in the combination, asestablished in the warnings sections of this subpart. (d) <T3>Directions. </T3>The labeling of the product states, under the heading``Directions,'' directions that conform to the directions established foreach ingredient in the directions sections of this subpart. When the timeintervals or age limitations for administration of the individual ingredientsdiffer, the directions for the combination product may not exceed any maximumdosage limits established for the individual ingredients in the applicableOTC drug monograph. <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 369_INTERPRETATIVE STATEMENTS RE WARNINGS ON DRUGS AND DEVICESFOR OVER-THE-COUNTER SALE </ITAG>4. The authority citation for 21 CFR Part 369 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 502, 503, 506, 507, 701, 52 Stat. 1050-1052 asamended, 1055-1056 as amended, 55 Stat. 851, 59 Stat. 463 as amended (21U.S.C. 352, 353, 356, 357, 371); 21 CFR 5.10 and 5.11. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 369.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>5. In Subpart B, andSection; 369.20 <T3>Drugs; recommended warning and caution statements </T3>is amended byremoving the statement, ``See also Rectal Preparations for additional warnings,''from the entry for ``BELLADONNA PREPARATIONS AND PREPARATIONS OF ITS ALKALOIDS(ATROPINE, HYOSCYAMINE, AND SCOPOLAMINE (HYOSCINE)); HYOSCYAMUS, STRAMONIUM,THEIR DERIVATIVES, AND RELATED DRUG PREPARATIONS.'' <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 369.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>6. In Subpart B, andSection; 369.20 <T3>Drugs; recommended warning and caution statements </T3>is amended byremoving the entry ``RECTAL PREPARATIONS FOR EXTERNAL USE.''<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: May 2, 1988 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Frank E. Young,  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Commissioner of Food and Drugs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-18200 Filed 8-12-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4160-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>